Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 HEALTH-RELATED LICENSING BOARDS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.381, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Insulin safety net. Data collected relating to an individual who seeks to access urgent-need new text begin covered new text end insulin or participates in a manufacturer's patient assistance program is classified under section 151.74, subdivision 11. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.65, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Student physical therapist. "Student physical therapist" means a person in a professional educational program, approved by the board under section 148.705, who is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements by performing physical therapy under the deleted text begin on-sitedeleted text end new text begin directnew text end supervision of a licensed physical therapist. deleted text begin "On-site supervision" means the physical therapist is easily available for instruction to the student physical therapist. The physical therapist shall have direct contact with the patient during at least every second treatment session by the student physical therapist.deleted text end new text begin "Direct supervision" means that the physical therapist is physically present and immediately available for supervision.new text end Telecommunicationsdeleted text begin , except within thedeleted text end deleted text begin facility,deleted text end does not meet the requirement of deleted text begin on-sitedeleted text end new text begin directnew text end supervision. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.65, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Student physical therapist assistant. "Student physical therapist assistant" means a person in a physical therapist assistant educational program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation in Physical Therapy Education (CAPTE) or a recognized comparable national accrediting agency approved by the board. The student physical therapist assistant, under the direct supervision of the physical therapist, or the direct supervision of the physical therapist and physical therapist assistantnew text begin teamnew text end , performs physical therapy interventions and assists with coordination, communication, documentation, and patient-client-related instruction. "Direct supervision" means the physical therapistnew text begin or physical therapist assistant when supervising a student physical therapist assistant as part of a physical therapist and physical therapist assistant teamnew text end is physically present and immediately available to provide instruction to the student physical therapist assistant.new text begin Telecommunications does not meet the requirement of direct supervision.new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.706, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Supervision. new text begin (a) new text end Every physical therapist who uses the services of a physical therapist assistant or physical therapy aide for the purpose of assisting in the practice of physical therapy is responsible for functions performed by the assistant or aide while engaged in such assistance. The physical therapist shall deleted text begin delegatedeleted text end new text begin directnew text end duties to the physical therapist assistant and assign tasks to the physical therapy aide in accordance with subdivision 2. deleted text begin Physical therapists who instruct student physical therapists and student physical therapist assistants are responsible for the functions performed by the students and shall supervise the students as provided under section 148.65, subdivisions 5 and 6. A licensed physical therapist may supervise no more than two physical therapist assistants at any time.deleted text end new text begin (b) A licensed physical therapist may supervise no more than two physical therapist assistants at any time. A physical therapist supervising physical therapist assistants is not required to be on site, but must be easily available by telecommunications. new text end new text begin (c) Physical therapists who instruct student physical therapists and student physical therapist assistants are responsible for the functions performed by the students and shall supervise the students as provided under section 148.65, subdivisions 5 and 6. A physical therapist supervising a student physical therapist must have direct contact with the patient during at least every second treatment session by the student physical therapist. A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant as part of a physical therapist and physical therapist assistant team who is supervising a student physical therapist assistant must have direct contact with the patient during at least every second treatment session by the student physical therapist assistant. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.706, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Delegationdeleted text end new text begin Directionnew text end of duties. The physical therapist deleted text begin may delegatedeleted text end new text begin is authorized to directnew text end patient treatment procedures only to a physical therapist assistant who has sufficient didactic and clinical preparation. The physical therapist deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not deleted text begin delegatedeleted text end new text begin directnew text end the following activities to deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end physical therapist assistant or to other supportive personnel: new text begin initial new text end patient new text begin examination and new text end evaluation, deleted text begin treatment planning, initial treatment, change of treatment,deleted text end new text begin development and modification of the plan of care,new text end and initial or final documentation. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.706, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Observation ofnew text begin and collaboration withnew text end physical therapist assistants. When new text begin a physical therapist directs new text end components of a patient's treatment deleted text begin are delegateddeleted text end to a physical therapist assistant, a physical therapist must deleted text begin provide on-site observation of the treatment and documentation of its appropriateness at least every six treatment sessions. The physical therapist is not required to be on site, but must be easily available by telecommunications.deleted text end new text begin do the following at least every six treatment sessions that the physical therapist assistant provides services:new text end new text begin (1) observe a portion of the patient treatment session with the physical therapist assistant, either in person or remotely via telehealth; and new text end new text begin (2) document a collaborative discussion with the physical therapist assistant and the continued appropriateness of the plan of care. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment. (a) deleted text begin By July 1, 2020,deleted text end Each manufacturer must establish procedures to makenew text begin coverednew text end insulin available in accordance with this section to eligible individuals who are in urgent need of new text begin covered new text end insulin or who are in need of access to an affordable new text begin covered new text end insulin supply. (b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: (1) "manufacturer" means a manufacturer engaged in the manufacturing of new text begin covered new text end insulin deleted text begin that is self-administered on an outpatient basisdeleted text end ; (2) "MNsure" means the Board of Directors of MNsure established in chapter 62V; (3) "navigator" has the meaning provided in section 62V.02; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) "pharmacy" means a pharmacy located in Minnesota and licensed under section 151.19 that operates in the community or outpatient license category under Minnesota Rules, part 6800.0350deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) "covered insulin" means a drug that is validly prescribed by a practitioner and contains insulin for use to treat diabetes. Covered insulin does not include an insulin product with a label approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that indicates the product is only for use for intravenous infusion. new text end (c) Any manufacturer with an annual gross revenue of $2,000,000 or less from new text begin covered new text end insulin sales in Minnesota is exempt from this section. To request a waiver under this paragraph, the manufacturer must submit a request to the Board of Pharmacy that includes documentation indicating that the manufacturer is eligible for an exemption. (d) deleted text begin Andeleted text end new text begin A coverednew text end insulin product is exempt from this section if the wholesale acquisition cost of the new text begin covered new text end insulin is $8 or less per milliliter or applicable National Council for Prescription Drug Plan billing unit, for the entire assessment time period, adjusted annually based on the Consumer Price Index. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Eligibility for urgent-need safety net program. (a) To be eligible to receive an urgent-need supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin under this section, an individual must attest to: (1) being a resident of Minnesota; (2) not being enrolled in medical assistance or MinnesotaCare; (3) not being enrolled in prescription drug coverage that limits the total amount of cost-sharing that the enrollee is required to pay for a 30-day supply ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin, including co-payments, deductibles, or coinsurance, to $75 or less, regardless of the type or amount of new text begin covered new text end insulin prescribed; (4) not having received an urgent-need supply ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin through this program within the previous 12 months, unless authorized under subdivision 9; and (5) being in urgent need ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "urgent need of new text begin covered new text end insulin" means having readily available for use less than a seven-day supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin and in need ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin in order to avoid the likelihood of suffering significant health consequences. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Access to urgent-need new text begin covered new text end insulin. (a) MNsure shall develop an application form to be used by an individual who is in urgent need ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin. The application must ask the individual to attest to the eligibility requirements described in subdivision 2. The form shall be accessible through MNsure's website. MNsure shall also make the form available to pharmacies and health care providers who prescribe or dispense new text begin covered new text end insulin, hospital emergency departments, urgent care clinics, and community health clinics. By submitting a completed, signed, and dated application to a pharmacy, the individual attests that the information contained in the application is correct. (b) If the individual is in urgent need ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin, the individual may present a completed, signed, and dated application form to a pharmacy. The individual must also: (1) have a deleted text begin validdeleted text end new text begin covered new text end insulin prescription; and (2) present the pharmacist with identification indicating Minnesota residency in the form of a valid Minnesota identification card, driver's license or permit, individual taxpayer identification number, or Tribal identification card as defined in section 171.072, paragraph (b). If the individual in urgent need of new text begin covered new text end insulin is under the age of 18, the individual's parent or legal guardian must provide the pharmacist with proof of residency. (c) Upon receipt of a completed and signed application, the pharmacist shall dispense the deleted text begin prescribeddeleted text end new text begin covered new text end insulin in an amount that will provide the individual with a 30-day supply. The pharmacy must notify the health care practitioner who issued the prescription order no later than 72 hours after thenew text begin coverednew text end insulin is dispensed. (d) The pharmacy may submit to the manufacturer of the dispensednew text begin coverednew text end insulin product or to the manufacturer's vendor a claim for payment that is in accordance with the National Council for Prescription Drug Program standards for electronic claims processing, unless the manufacturer agrees to send to the pharmacy a replacement supply of the same new text begin covered new text end insulin as dispensed in the amount dispensed. If the pharmacy submits an electronic claim to the manufacturer or the manufacturer's vendor, the manufacturer or vendor shall reimburse the pharmacy in an amount that covers the pharmacy's acquisition cost. (e) The pharmacy may collect deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a coverednew text end insulin co-payment from the individual to cover the pharmacy's costs of processing and dispensing in an amount not to exceed $35 for the 30-day supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin dispensed. (f) The pharmacy shall also provide each eligible individual with the information sheet described in subdivision 7 and a list of trained navigators provided by the Board of Pharmacy for the individual to contact if the individual needs to access ongoingnew text begin coverednew text end insulin coverage options, including assistance in: (1) applying for medical assistance or MinnesotaCare; (2) applying for a qualified health plan offered through MNsure, subject to open and special enrollment periods; (3) accessing information on providers who participate in prescription drug discount programs, including providers who are authorized to participate in the 340B program under section 340b of the federal Public Health Services Act, United States Code, title 42, section 256b; and (4) accessingnew text begin coverednew text end insulin manufacturers' patient assistance programs, co-payment assistance programs, and other foundation-based programs. (g) The pharmacist shall retain a copy of the application form submitted by the individual to the pharmacy for reporting and auditing purposes. (h) A manufacturer may submit to the commissioner of administration a request for reimbursement in an amount not to exceed $35 for each 30-day supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin the manufacturer provides under paragraph (d). The commissioner of administration shall determine the manner and format for submitting and processing requests for reimbursement. After receiving a reimbursement request, the commissioner of administration shall reimburse the manufacturer in an amount not to exceed $35 for each 30-day supply ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin the manufacturer provided under paragraph (d). Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Continuing safety net program; general. (a) Each manufacturer shall make a patient assistance program available to any individual who meets the requirements of this subdivision. Each manufacturer's patient assistance programs must meet the requirements of this section. Each manufacturer shall provide the Board of Pharmacy with information regarding the manufacturer's patient assistance program, including contact information for individuals to call for assistance in accessing their patient assistance program. (b) To be eligible to participate in a manufacturer's patient assistance program, the individual must: (1) be a Minnesota resident with a valid Minnesota identification card that indicates Minnesota residency in the form of a Minnesota identification card, driver's license or permit, individual taxpayer identification number, or Tribal identification card as defined in section 171.072, paragraph (b). If the individual is under the age of 18, the individual's parent or legal guardian must provide proof of residency; (2) have a family income that is equal to or less than 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; (3) not be enrolled in medical assistance or MinnesotaCare; (4) not be eligible to receive health care through a federally funded program or receive prescription drug benefits through the Department of Veterans Affairs; and (5) not be enrolled in prescription drug coverage through an individual or group health plan that limits the total amount of cost-sharing that an enrollee is required to pay for a 30-day supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin, including co-payments, deductibles, or coinsurance to $75 or less, regardless of the type or amount of new text begin covered new text end insulin needed. (c) Notwithstanding the requirement in paragraph (b), clause (4), an individual who is enrolled in Medicare Part D is eligible for a manufacturer's patient assistance program if the individual has spent $1,000 on prescription drugs in the current calendar year and meets the eligibility requirements in paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (3). (d) An individual who is interested in participating in a manufacturer's patient assistance program may apply directly to the manufacturer; apply through the individual's health care practitioner, if the practitioner participates; or contact a trained navigator for assistance in finding a long-termnew text begin coverednew text end insulin supply solution, including assistance in applying to a manufacturer's patient assistance program. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Continuing safety net program; manufacturer's responsibilities. (a) Upon receipt of an application for the manufacturer's patient assistance program, the manufacturer shall process the application and determine eligibility. The manufacturer shall notify the applicant of the determination within ten business days of receipt of the application. If necessary, the manufacturer may request additional information from the applicant. If additional information is needed, the manufacturer must notify the applicant within five business days of receipt of the application as to what information is being requested. Within three business days of receipt of the requested information, the manufacturer must determine eligibility and notify the applicant of the determination. If the individual has been determined to be not eligible, the manufacturer must include the reasons for denying eligibility in the notification. The individual may seek an appeal of the determination in accordance with subdivision 8. (b) If the individual is determined to be eligible, the manufacturer shall provide the individual with an eligibility statement or other indication that the individual has been determined eligible for the manufacturer's patient assistance program. An individual's eligibility is valid for 12 months and is renewable upon a redetermination of eligibility. (c) If the eligible individual has prescription drug coverage through an individual or group health plan, the manufacturer may determine that the individual'snew text begin coverednew text end insulin needs are better addressed through the use of the manufacturer's co-payment assistance program, in which case, the manufacturer shall inform the individual and provide the individual with the necessary coupons to submit to a pharmacy. In no instance shall an eligible individual be required to pay more than the co-payment amount specified under subdivision 6, paragraph (e). Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Continuing safety net program; process. (a) The individual shall submit to a pharmacy the statement of eligibility provided by the manufacturer under subdivision 5, paragraph (b). Upon receipt of an individual's eligibility status, the pharmacy shall submit an order containing the name of thenew text begin coverednew text end insulin product and the daily dosage amount as contained in a valid prescription to the product's manufacturer. (b) The pharmacy must include with the order to the manufacturer the following information: (1) the pharmacy's name and shipping address; (2) the pharmacy's office telephone number, fax number, email address, and contact name; and (3) any specific days or times when deliveries are not accepted by the pharmacy. (c) Upon receipt of an order from a pharmacy and the information described in paragraph (b), the manufacturer shall send to the pharmacy a 90-day supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin as ordered, unless a lesser amount is requested in the order, at no charge to the individual or pharmacy. (d) Except as authorized under paragraph (e), the pharmacy shall provide the new text begin covered new text end insulin to the individual at no charge to the individual. The pharmacy shall not provide new text begin covered new text end insulin received from the manufacturer to any individual other than the individual associated with the specific order. The pharmacy shall not seek reimbursement for thenew text begin coverednew text end insulin received from the manufacturer or from any third-party payer. (e) The pharmacy may collect a co-payment from the individual to cover the pharmacy's costs for processing and dispensing in an amount not to exceed $50 for each 90-day supply if thenew text begin coverednew text end insulin is sent to the pharmacy. (f) The pharmacy may submit to a manufacturer a reorder for an individual if the individual's eligibility statement has not expired. Upon receipt of a reorder from a pharmacy, the manufacturer must send to the pharmacy an additional 90-day supply of the product, unless a lesser amount is requested, at no charge to the individual or pharmacy if the individual's eligibility statement has not expired. (g) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), a manufacturer may send thenew text begin coverednew text end insulin as ordered directly to the individual if the manufacturer provides a mail order service option. (h) A manufacturer may submit to the commissioner of administration a request for reimbursement in an amount not to exceed $105 for each 90-day supply ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin the manufacturer provides under paragraphs (c) and (f). The commissioner of administration shall determine the manner and format for submitting and processing requests for reimbursement. After receiving a reimbursement request, the commissioner of administration shall reimburse the manufacturer in an amount not to exceed $105 for each 90-day supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin the manufacturer provided under paragraphs (c) and (f). If the manufacturer provides less than a 90-day supply of new text begin covered new text end insulin under paragraphs (c) and (f), the manufacturer may submit a request for reimbursement not to exceed $35 for each 30-day supply ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin provided. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Board of Pharmacy and MNsure responsibilities. (a) The Board of Pharmacy shall develop an information sheet to post on its website and provide a link to the information sheet on the board's website for pharmacies, health care practitioners, hospital emergency departments, urgent care clinics, and community health clinics. The information sheet must contain: (1) a description of the urgent-neednew text begin coverednew text end insulin safety net program, including how to access the program; (2) a description of each new text begin covered new text end insulin manufacturer's patient assistance program and cost-sharing assistance program, including contact information on accessing the assistance programs for each manufacturer; (3) information on how to contact a trained navigator for assistance in applying for medical assistance, MinnesotaCare, a qualified health plan, or deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a coverednew text end insulin manufacturer's patient assistance programs; (4) information on how to contact the Board of Pharmacy if a manufacturer determines that an individual is not eligible for the manufacturer's patient assistance program; and (5) notification that an individual in need of assistance may contact their local county social service department for more information or assistance in accessing ongoing affordable new text begin covered new text end insulin options. (b) The board shall also inform each individual who accesses urgent-neednew text begin coverednew text end insulin through the insulin safety net program or accesses a manufacturer's patient assistance program that the individual may participate in a survey conducted by the Department of Health regarding satisfaction with the program. The board shall provide contact information for the individual to learn more about the survey and how to participate. This information may be included on the information sheet described in paragraph (a). (c) MNsure, in consultation with the Board of Pharmacy and the commissioner of human services, shall develop a training program for navigators to provide navigators with information and resources necessary to assist individuals in accessing appropriate long-term new text begin covered new text end insulin options. (d) MNsure, in consultation with the Board of Pharmacy, shall compile a list of navigators who have completed the training program and who are available to assist individuals in accessing affordable new text begin covered new text end insulin coverage options. The list shall be made available through the board's website and to pharmacies and health care practitioners who dispense and prescribe new text begin covered new text end insulin. (e) If a navigator assists an individual in accessing deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a coverednew text end insulin manufacturer's patient assistance program, MNsure, within the available appropriation, shall pay the navigator a onetime application assistance bonus of no less than $25. If a navigator receives a payment per enrollee of an assistance bonus under section 62V.05, subdivision 4, or 256.962, subdivision 5, the navigator shall not receive compensation under this paragraph. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Additional 30-day urgent-need new text begin covered new text end insulin supply. (a) If an individual has applied for medical assistance or MinnesotaCare but has not been determined eligible or has been determined eligible but coverage has not become effective or the individual has been determined ineligible for the manufacturer's patient assistance program by the manufacturer and the individual has requested a review pursuant to subdivision 8 but the panel has not rendered a decision, the individual may access urgent-neednew text begin coverednew text end insulin under subdivision 3 if the individual is in urgent need ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin as defined under subdivision 2, paragraph (b). (b) To access an additional 30-day supply ofnew text begin coverednew text end insulin, the individual must attest to the pharmacy that the individual meets the requirements of paragraph (a) and must comply with subdivision 3, paragraph (b). Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Penalty. (a) If a manufacturer fails to comply with this section, the board may assess an administrative penalty of $200,000 per month of noncompliance, with the penalty increasing to $400,000 per month if the manufacturer continues to be in noncompliance after six months, and increasing to $600,000 per month if the manufacturer continues to be in noncompliance after one year. The penalty shall remain at $600,000 per month for as long as the manufacturer continues to be in noncompliance. (b) In addition, a manufacturer is subject to the administrative penalties specified in paragraph (a) if the manufacturer fails to: (1) provide a hotline for individuals to call or access between 8 a.m. and 10 p.m. on weekdays and between 10 a.m. and 6 p.m. on Saturdays; and (2) list on the manufacturer's website the eligibility requirements for the manufacturer's patient assistance programs for Minnesota residents. (c) Any penalty assessed under this subdivision shall be deposited in a separatenew text begin coverednew text end insulin assistance account in the special revenue fund. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Data. (a) Any data collected, created, received, maintained, or disseminated by the Board of Pharmacy, the legislative auditor, the commissioner of health, MNsure, or a trained navigator under this section related to an individual who is seeking to access urgent-need new text begin covered new text end insulin or participate in a manufacturer's patient assistance program under this section is classified as private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, and may not be retained for longer than ten years. (b) A manufacturer must maintain the privacy of all data received from any individual applying for the manufacturer's patient assistance program under this section and is prohibited from selling, sharing, or disseminating data received under this section unless required to under this section or the individual has provided the manufacturer with a signed authorization. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Reports. (a) By February 15 of each year, deleted text begin beginning February 15, 2021,deleted text end each manufacturer shall report to the Board of Pharmacy the following: (1) the number of Minnesota residents who accessed and receivednew text begin coverednew text end insulin on an urgent-need basis under this section in the preceding calendar year; (2) the number of Minnesota residents participating in the manufacturer's patient assistance program in the preceding calendar year, including the number of Minnesota residents who the manufacturer determined were ineligible for their patient assistance program; and (3) the value of thenew text begin coverednew text end insulin provided by the manufacturer under clauses (1) and (2). For purposes of this paragraph, "value" means the wholesale acquisition cost of thenew text begin coverednew text end insulin provided. (b) By March 15 of each year, deleted text begin beginning March 15, 2021,deleted text end the Board of Pharmacy shall submit the information reported in paragraph (a) to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance. The board shall also include in the report any administrative penalties assessed under subdivision 10, including the name of the manufacturer and amount of the penalty assessed. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Program review; legislative auditor. (a) The legislative auditor is requested to conduct a program review to determine: (1) whether the manufacturers are meeting the responsibilities required under this section, including but not limited to: (i) reimbursing pharmacies for urgent-need new text begin covered new text end insulin dispensed under subdivision 3; (ii) determining eligibility in a timely manner and notifying the individuals as required under subdivision 5; and (iii) providing pharmacies with new text begin covered new text end insulin product under the manufacturers' patient assistance programs; and (2) whether the training program developed for navigators is adequate and easily accessible for navigators interested in becoming trained, and that there is a sufficient number of trained navigators to provide assistance to individuals in need of assistance. (b) The legislative auditor may access application forms retained by pharmacies under subdivision 3, paragraph (g), to determine whether urgent-neednew text begin coverednew text end insulin is being dispensed in accordance with this section. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.741, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Board" means the Minnesota Board of Pharmacy under section 151.02. new text begin (c) "Covered insulin" has the meaning given in section 151.74, subdivision 1. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end "Manufacturer" means a manufacturer licensed under section 151.252 and engaged in the manufacturing of deleted text begin prescriptiondeleted text end new text begin covered new text end insulin. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.741, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Assessment of registration fee. (a) The board shall assess each manufacturer an annual registration fee of $100,000, except as provided in paragraph (b). The board shall notify each manufacturer of this requirement beginning November 1, 2024, and each November 1 thereafter. (b) A manufacturer may request an exemption from the annual registration fee. The board shall exempt a manufacturer from the annual registration fee if the manufacturer can demonstrate to the board, in the form and manner specified by the board, that gross revenue from sales of deleted text begin prescriptiondeleted text end new text begin covered new text end insulin produced by that manufacturer and sold or delivered within or into Minnesota was less than five percent of the total gross revenue from sales of deleted text begin prescriptiondeleted text end new text begin covered new text end insulin produced by all manufacturers and sold or delivered within or into Minnesota in the previous calendar year. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 151.741, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Insulin repayment account; annual transfer from health care access fund. (a) The insulin repayment account is established in the special revenue fund in the state treasury. Money in the account is appropriated each fiscal year to the commissioner of administration to reimburse manufacturers for new text begin covered new text end insulin dispensed under the insulin safety net program in section 151.74, in accordance with section 151.74, subdivisions 3, paragraph (h), and 6, paragraph (h), and to cover costs incurred by the commissioner in providing these reimbursement payments. (b) By June 30, 2025, and each June 30 thereafter, the commissioner of administration shall certify to the commissioner of management and budget the total amount expended in the prior fiscal year for: (1) reimbursement to manufacturers for new text begin covered new text end insulin dispensed under the insulin safety net program in section 151.74, in accordance with section 151.74, subdivisions 3, paragraph (h), and 6, paragraph (h); and (2) costs incurred by the commissioner of administration in providing the reimbursement payments described in clause (1). (c) The commissioner of management and budget shall transfer from the health care access fund to the insulin repayment account, beginning July 1, 2025, and each July 1 thereafter, an amount equal to the amount to which the commissioner of administration certified pursuant to paragraph (b). Sec. 22. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.74, subdivision 15, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 2 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62U.04, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Encounter data. (a) All health plan companies, dental organizations, and third-party administrators shall submit encounter data on a monthly basis to a private entity designated by the commissioner of health. The data shall be submitted in a form and manner specified by the commissioner subject to the following requirements: (1) the data must be de-identified data as described under the Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 164.514; (2) the data for each encounter must include an identifier for the patient's health care home if the patient has selected a health care home, data on contractual value-based payments, and data deemed necessary by the commissioner to uniquely identify claims in the individual health insurance market; (3) the data must include enrollee race and ethnicity, to the extent available, for claims incurred on or after January 1, 2023; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) except for the data described in clauses (2) and (3), the data must not include information that is not included in a health care claim, dental care claim, or equivalent encounter information transaction that is required under section 62J.536deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) the data must include at least the following data fields for any fully denied claims: new text end new text begin (i) an indicator of which claim lines were denied; new text end new text begin (ii) the reason for denial of each denied claim line; new text end new text begin (iii) the claim line status in terms of adjudication; and new text end new text begin (iv) a claim identifier to link the original claim to subsequent action on the claim. new text end (b) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall only use the data submitted under paragraph (a) to carry out the commissioner's responsibilities in this section, including supplying the data to providers so they can verify their results of the peer grouping process consistent with the recommendations developed pursuant to subdivision 3c, paragraph (d), and adopted by the commissioner and, if necessary, submit comments to the commissioner or initiate an appeal. (c) Data on providers collected under this subdivision are private data on individuals or nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02. Notwithstanding the data classifications in this paragraph, data on providers collected under this subdivision may be released or published as authorized in subdivision 11. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall establish procedures and safeguards to protect the integrity and confidentiality of any data that it maintains. (d) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall not publish analyses or reports that identify, or could potentially identify, individual patients. (e) The commissioner shall compile summary information on the data submitted under this subdivision. The commissioner shall work with its vendors to assess the data submitted in terms of compliance with the data submission requirements and the completeness of the data submitted by comparing the data with summary information compiled by the commissioner and with established and emerging data quality standards to ensure data quality. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62U.04, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Expanded access to and use of the all-payer claims data. (a) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall make the data submitted under subdivisions 4, 5, 5a, and 5b, including data classified as private or nonpublic, available to individuals and organizations engaged in research on, or efforts to effect transformation in, health care outcomes, access, quality, disparities, or spending, provided the use of the data serves a public benefit. Data made available under this subdivision may not be used to: (1) create an unfair market advantage for any participant in the health care market in Minnesota, including health plan companies, payers, and providers; (2) reidentify or attempt to reidentify an individual in the data; or (3) publicly report contract details between a health plan company and provider and derived from the data. (b) To implement paragraph (a), the commissioner shall: (1) establish detailed requirements for data access; a process for data users to apply to access and use the data; legally enforceable data use agreements to which data users must consent; a clear and robust oversight process for data access and use, including a data management plan, that ensures compliance with state and federal data privacy laws; agreements for state agencies and the University of Minnesota to ensure proper and efficient use and security of data; and technical assistance for users of the data and for stakeholders; (2) deleted text begin develop adeleted text end new text begin assess fees according to thenew text end fee schedule new text begin in subdivision 14 new text end to support the cost of expanded access to and use of the data, provided the fees charged under the schedule do not create a barrier to access or use for those most affected by disparities; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) create a research advisory group to advise the commissioner on applications for data use under this subdivision, including an examination of the rigor of the research approach, the technical capabilities of the proposed user, and the ability of the proposed user to successfully safeguard the datadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) annually publish on the Department of Health website a list of projects authorized under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62U.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Fees for expanded access to and use of the all-payer claims database. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "custom data set or analysis" means a de-identified data set or report for which a standard data set or limited use data sets are not appropriate, that only provides the minimum necessary data, and that is de-identified using the expert determination method as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 164.514(b)(1); new text end new text begin (2) "data file" means a data file derived from medical claims, pharmacy claims, dental claims, eligibility information, membership information, or provider information for a single year; new text end new text begin (3) "limited use data set" means a data set that meets the requirements in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 164.514(e)(2), and may include protected health information from which certain direct identifiers of individuals have been removed under the principle of minimum information necessary; and new text end new text begin (4) "standard data set" means a static data release designed by the commissioner to serve a wide range of projects in which nearly all de-identified data elements are disclosed in one release after applying the safe harbor de-identification method defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 164.514(b)(2), and from which protected health information and any combination of data elements that directly identify any person are excluded. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must assess fees on an individual or organization that receives data under subdivision 13 for the cost of accessing or receiving the data. Costs under this paragraph may include but are not limited to the cost of producing and releasing data to the individual or organization under subdivision 13 and managing infrastructure and operations. The commissioner must assess fees according to the following schedule based on the type of data requested and number of years for which access is requested: new text end new text begin (1) the fee for a standard data set is $3,500 per data file per year; new text end new text begin (2) the fee for a limited use data set is $7,000 per data file per year; and new text end new text begin (3) the fee for a custom data set or analysis is $89 per hour of staff time expended, with fees not to exceed the cost of 65 hours of staff time. new text end new text begin (c) An individual or organization that receives approval to access or receive data under subdivision 13 must pay all the required fees in full before accessing or receiving the requested data. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may grant a partial or full waiver of the fees in paragraph (b) if the individual or organization requesting the data meets at least one of the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) the fees represent a financial hardship to the individual or organization; new text end new text begin (2) the organization is a self-insured data submitter under this section; new text end new text begin (3) the individual or organization is affiliated with an academic institution; new text end new text begin (4) the individual or organization requests a high volume of data files; or new text end new text begin (5) the request is from a Tribal health director for, or the governing body of, one of the 11 federally recognized Tribes in Minnesota. new text end new text begin In determining whether to grant a waiver under this paragraph, the commissioner may consult the research advisory group established under subdivision 13. new text end new text begin (e) Fees paid by an individual or organization approved to access or receive data under subdivision 13 are nonrefundable. Fees collected under this subdivision must be deposited into an account in the special revenue fund. Money in that account does not cancel and is appropriated to the commissioner to offset the cost of providing access to data under subdivision 13 and maintaining data submitted under subdivisions 4 to 5b. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner must publish the fee schedule in paragraph (b) on the Department of Health website. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1222, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2e. new text end new text begin Private residential pool used for certified swimming classes. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, part 4717.0250, subpart 7, a private residential pool may be used as part of a business if the private residential pool is used by a paying guest of the homeowner and the guest is participating in a certified swimming class conducted by the homeowner, provided that: new text end new text begin (1) the homeowner is a certified swimming instructor and is conducting a certified swimming class on a one-on-one basis; new text end new text begin (2) not more than four individuals are in the pool at the same time during the class; new text end new text begin (3) prior to each new paying guest beginning participation in a certified swimming class: new text end new text begin (i) the guest, or the guest's parent or legal guardian if the guest is a minor, provides written consent to use of the pool. The written consent must include a statement that the guest, or the guest's parent or legal guardian if the guest is a minor, has received and read materials provided by the Department of Health with information on the risk of disease transmission and other risks associated with pools and a statement that the Department of Health does not monitor or inspect the homeowner's pool to ensure compliance with the requirements in section 144.1222 or Minnesota Rules, chapter 4717; and new text end new text begin (ii) the homeowner tests the pool's water for the concentration of chlorine or bromine, pH, and alkalinity, and the water in the pool meets the requirements for disinfection residual, pH, and alkalinity in Minnesota Rules, part 4717.1750, subparts 4, 5, and 6; and new text end new text begin (4) the following notice is conspicuously posted at the pool and, prior to each new paying guest beginning participation in a certified swimming class, is provided to the guest or to the guest's parent or legal guardian if the guest is a minor: new text end new text begin "NOTICE new text end new text begin This pool is exempt from state and local anti-entrapment and sanitary requirements that prevent waterborne diseases such as Legionnaires' disease, Pseudomonas folliculitis (hot tub rash), and chemical burns and is not subject to inspection. new text end new text begin USE AT YOUR OWN RISK" new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1222, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. (b) "ASME/ANSI standard" means a safety standard accredited by the American National Standards Institute and published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers. (c) "ASTM standard" means a safety standard issued by ASTM International, formerly known as the American Society for Testing and Materials. (d) "Public pool" means any pool other than a private residential pool, that is: (1) open to the public generally, whether for a fee or free of charge; (2) open exclusively to members of an organization and their guests; (3) open to residents of a multiunit apartment building, apartment complex, residential real estate development, or other multifamily residential area; (4) open to patrons of a hotel or lodging or other public accommodation facility; or (5) operated by a person in a park, school, licensed child care facility, group home, motel, camp, resort, club, condominium, manufactured home park, or political subdivision with the exception of swimming pools at family day care homes licensed under section 142B.41, subdivision 9, paragraph (a). (e) "Unblockable suction outlet or drain" means a drain of any size and shape that a human body cannot sufficiently block to create a suction entrapment hazard and meets ASME/ANSI standards. new text begin (f) "Certified swimming class" means an infant swimming resource (ISR) class; an American Red Cross swimming class, swimming lesson, or learn-to-swim class; or any other swimming class certified by a nationally accredited organization that operates in all 50 states. new text end new text begin (g) "Certified swimming instructor" means a certified ISR instructor; a certified American Red Cross swimming instructor or swim coach; or any other swimming instructor certified by a nationally accredited organization that operates in all 50 states. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 144.125, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Duty to perform testing. (a) It is the duty of (1) the administrative officer or other person in charge of each institution caring for infants 28 days or less of age, (2) the person required in pursuance of the provisions of section 144.215, to register the birth of a child, or (3) the nurse midwife or midwife in attendance at the birth, to arrange to have administered to every infant or child in its care tests for heritable and congenital disorders according to subdivision 2 and rules prescribed by the state commissioner of health. (b) Testing, recording of test results, reporting of test results, and follow-up of infants with heritable congenital disorders, including hearing loss detected through the early hearing detection and intervention program in section 144.966, shall be performed at the times and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner of health. (c) The fee to support the newborn screening program, including tests administered under this section and section 144.966, shall be $184.35 per specimen. This fee amount shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state government special revenue fund.new text begin If the individual described in paragraph (a) submits to an insurer a claim for reimbursement for a newborn screening program fee but does not receive reimbursement from the insurer, the individual may request a special fee exemption form from the newborn screening program and may apply for an exemption from the fee. To qualify for the exemption, the individual must provide documentation to the newborn screening program that the insurer did not reimburse the individual for the fee.new text end (d) The fee to offset the cost of the support services provided under section 144.966, subdivision 3a, shall be $15 per specimen. This fee shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1501, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Availability. (a) The commissioner of health shall use money appropriated for health professional education loan forgiveness in this section: (1) for medical residents, physicians, mental health professionals, and alcohol and drug counselors agreeing to practice in designated rural areas or underserved urban communities or specializing in the area of pediatric psychiatry; (2) for midlevel practitioners agreeing to practice in designated rural areas or to teach at least 12 credit hours, or 720 hours per year in the nursing field in a postsecondary program at the undergraduate level or the equivalent at the graduate level; (3) for nurses who agree to practice in a Minnesota nursing home; in an intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disability; in a hospital if the hospital owns and operates a Minnesota nursing home and a minimum of 50 percent of the hours worked by the nurse is in the nursing home; in an assisted living facility as defined in section 144G.08, subdivision 7; or for a home care provider as defined in section 144A.43, subdivision 4; or agree to teach at least 12 credit hours, or 720 hours per year in the nursing field in a postsecondary program at the undergraduate level or the equivalent at the graduate level; (4) for other health care technicians agreeing to teach at least 12 credit hours, or 720 hours per year in their designated field in a postsecondary program at the undergraduate level or the equivalent at the graduate level. The commissioner, in consultation with the Healthcare Education-Industry Partnership, shall determine the health care fields where the need is the greatest, including, but not limited to, respiratory therapy, clinical laboratory technology, radiologic technology, and surgical technology; (5) for pharmacists, advanced dental therapists, dental therapists, and public health nurses who agree to practice in designated rural areas; (6) for dentists agreeing to deliver at least 25 percent of the dentist's yearly patient encounters to state public program enrollees or patients receiving sliding fee schedule discounts through a formal sliding fee schedule meeting the standards established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 51c.303; and (7) for nurses employed as a hospital nurse by a nonprofit hospital and providing direct care to patients at the nonprofit hospital. (b) Appropriations made for health professional education loan forgiveness in this section do not cancel and are available until expendeddeleted text begin , except that at the end of each biennium, any remaining balance in the account that is not committed by contract and not needed to fulfill existing commitments shall cancel to the funddeleted text end . Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1503, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Selection process. The commissioner shall determine a maximum award for grants and loan forgiveness, and shall make selections based on the information provided in the grant application, including the demonstrated need for an applicant provider to enhance the education of its workforce, the proposed employee scholarship or loan forgiveness selection process, the applicant's proposed budget, and other criteria as determined by the commissioner. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, amounts appropriated for purposes of this section do not cancel and are available until expendeddeleted text begin , except that at the end of each biennium, any remaining amount that is not committed by contract and not needed to fulfill existing commitments shall cancel to the general funddeleted text end . Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1505, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: (1) "eligible advanced practice registered nurse program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is currently accredited as a master's, doctoral, or postgraduate level advanced practice registered nurse program by the Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education or by the Accreditation Commission for Education in Nursing, or deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin has presented a credible plan asnew text end a candidate for accreditation; (2) "eligible dental therapy program" means a dental therapy education program or advanced dental therapy education program deleted text begin that isdeleted text end located in Minnesota deleted text begin and is eitherdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end : (i) new text begin is new text end approved by the Board of Dentistry; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (ii) new text begin is new text end currently accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation;new text begin ornew text end new text begin (iii) has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditation; new text end (3) "eligible mental health professional program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is deleted text begin listeddeleted text end new text begin currently accredited new text end as a mental health professional program by the appropriate accrediting body for clinical social work, psychology, marriage and family therapy, or licensed professional clinical counseling, or deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin has presented a credible plan asnew text end a candidate for accreditation; (4) "eligible pharmacy program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is currently accredited as a doctor of pharmacy program by the Accreditation Council on Pharmacy Educationnew text begin or has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditationnew text end ; (5) "eligible physician assistant program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is currently accredited as a physician assistant program by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant, or deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin has presented a credible plan asnew text end a candidate for accreditation; (6) "mental health professional" means an individual providing clinical services in the treatment of mental illness who meets one of the qualifications under section 245.462, subdivision 18; (7) "eligible physician training program" means new text begin a medical school training program or new text end a physician residency training program located in Minnesota and that is currently accredited by the accrediting body or has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditation; (8) "eligible dental program" means a dental education program or a dental residency training program located in Minnesota and that is currently accredited by the accrediting body or has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditation; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (9) "project" means a project to deleted text begin establish or expanddeleted text end new text begin (i) plan or implement a new eligible new text end clinical training deleted text begin for physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, pharmacists, dental therapists, advanced dental therapists, or mental health professionals in Minnesota.deleted text end new text begin program or increase the base number of trainees in an existing eligible clinical training program, or (ii) add or expand rural rotations or clinical training experiences in an existing eligible clinical training program;new text end new text begin (10) "rural community" means a Tribal Nation, statutory city, home rule charter city, or township in Minnesota that is outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, excluding the cities of Duluth, Mankato, Moorhead, Rochester, and St. Cloud; and new text end new text begin (11) "underserved community" means a Minnesota area or population included in the list of designated primary medical care health professional shortage areas, medically underserved areas, or medically underserved populations maintained and updated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1505, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Programs. (a) For advanced practice provider clinical training expansion grants, the commissioner of health shall award deleted text begin health professional training sitedeleted text end grants to eligible physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, pharmacy, dental therapy, and mental health professional programs to plan and implement deleted text begin expandeddeleted text end new text begin a new eligible clinical training program or increase the base number of trainees in an existing eligible new text end clinical trainingnew text begin programnew text end . new text begin Clinical training must take place in rural communities or underserved communities. new text end A planning grant shall not exceed $75,000, and a three-year training grant shall not exceed $300,000 per project. The commissioner may provide a deleted text begin one-year,deleted text end no-cost extension for grants. (b) For health professional rural deleted text begin and underserveddeleted text end clinical rotations grants, the commissioner of health shall award deleted text begin health professional training sitedeleted text end grants to new text begin existing new text end eligible physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, pharmacy, dentistry, dental therapy, and mental health professional new text begin training new text end programs to deleted text begin augment existing clinical deleted text end deleted text begin training programs todeleted text end addnew text begin , expand, or enhancenew text end rural deleted text begin and underserveddeleted text end rotations or clinical training experiences, such as credential or certificate rural tracks or other specialized training. new text begin Rotations and clinical training experiences must take place in rural communities. new text end For physician and dentist training, the expanded training must include rotations in primary care settings such as community clinics, hospitals, health maintenance organizations, or practices in rural communities. (c) new text begin Advanced practice provider clinical training expansion grant new text end funds may be used for: (1) deleted text begin establishing or expanding rotationsdeleted text end new text begin planningnew text end and new text begin implementing a new new text end clinical trainingnew text begin program or increasing the base number of trainees in an existing clinical training program as described in paragraph (a)new text end ; (2) recruitment, training, and retention of students deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end facultynew text begin , and preceptorsnew text end ; (3) connecting students with appropriate clinical training sites, internships, practicums, or externship deleted text begin activitiesdeleted text end new text begin opportunitiesnew text end ; (4) travel and lodging for students; (5) faculty, student, and preceptor salaries, incentives, or other financial support; (6) development and implementation of new text begin health equity and new text end cultural deleted text begin competencydeleted text end new text begin responsiveness new text end training; (7) evaluationsnew text begin of the clinical training program to inform program improvementsnew text end ; (8) training site improvements, fees, equipment, and supplies required to establish, maintain, or expand a training program; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (9) supporting clinical education in which trainees are part of a primary care team modeldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (10) onboarding expenses for trainees to meet clinical training site requirements. new text end new text begin (d) Health professional rural clinical rotation grant funds may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) adding, expanding, or enhancing rural rotations and clinical training experiences in an existing clinical training program as described in paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (2) recruitment, training, and retention of students, faculty, and preceptors; new text end new text begin (3) connecting students with appropriate clinical training sites, internships, practicums, or externship opportunities; new text end new text begin (4) travel and lodging for students; new text end new text begin (5) faculty, student, and preceptor salaries, stipends, or other financial support; new text end new text begin (6) development and implementation of health equity and cultural responsiveness training; new text end new text begin (7) evaluations of the rural rotation or clinical training experience to inform program improvements; new text end new text begin (8) training site improvements, fees, equipment, and supplies required to establish or expand rural rotations or clinical training experiences; new text end new text begin (9) supporting clinical education in which trainees are part of a primary care team model; and new text end new text begin (10) onboarding expenses for trainees to meet clinical training site requirements. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1505, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Applications. new text begin (a) new text end Eligible physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, pharmacy, dental therapy, dental, physician, and mental health professional programs seeking a grant shall apply to the commissioner. Applications new text begin for advanced practice provider clinical training expansion grants new text end must include a description of the number of additional students who will be trained using grant fundsdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin and new text end attestation that funding will be used to support an increase in the number of clinical training slotsdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end new text begin (b) All applications must include: (1)new text end a description of the problem that the proposed project will address; new text begin (2) new text end a description of the project, including all costs associated with the projectdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ; (3)new text end sources of funds for the projectdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ; (4)new text end detailed uses of all funds for the projectdeleted text begin ,deleted text end and the results expected; and new text begin (5) new text end a plan to maintain or operate deleted text begin any component included indeleted text end the project after the grant periodnew text begin , including a description of potential barriers to sustainabilitynew text end . deleted text begin The applicantdeleted text end new text begin Applicantsnew text end must describe achievable objectives, a timetable, and roles and capabilities of responsible individuals in the organization. deleted text begin Applicants applying under subdivision 2, paragraph (b),deleted text end new text begin (c) Applications for rural clinical rotation grantsnew text end must include new text begin a description of the new, expanded, or enhanced rural rotations or clinical training experiences; attestation that funding will be used to support improved rural clinical training experiences; and new text end information about length of training and training site settings, geographic location of rural sites, and rural populations expected to be served. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Eligible program" means a program that meets the following criteria: (1) is located in Minnesota; (2) trains medical residents in the specialties of family medicine, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, psychiatry, geriatrics, or general surgery in rural residency training programs or in community-based ambulatory care centers that primarily serve the underservednew text begin , or trains postdoctoral psychology residentsnew text end ; and (3) is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education new text begin or the American Psychological Association new text end or presents a credible plan to obtain accreditation. new text begin (c) "Rural community" means a Tribal Nation, statutory city, home rule charter city, or township in Minnesota that is outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, excluding the cities of Duluth, Mankato, Moorhead, Rochester, and St. Cloud. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Rural residency training program" means a new text begin rural medical new text end residency program new text begin or a rural psychology residency program new text end that provides deleted text begin an initial year ofdeleted text end training in an accredited residency program in Minnesota. deleted text begin The subsequent years of the residency program aredeleted text end new text begin At least two-thirds of the residency training must benew text end based in rural communities, utilizing local clinics and community hospitals, with specialty rotations in nearby regional medical centers.new text begin When specialty rotations cannot be fulfilled within rural communities, training may occur in regional or urban sites as long as at least one-half of all training occurs in rural communities. For residency training programs in general surgery, pediatrics, and psychiatry, at least one-half of the residency training must be based in communities outside the seven-county metropolitan area, with rotations in rural communities.new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Community-based ambulatory care centers" means federally qualified health centers, community mental health centers, rural health clinics, health centers operated by the Indian Health Service, an Indian Tribe or Tribal organization, or an urban American Indian organization or an entity receiving funds under Title X of the Public Health Service Act. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Eligible project" means a project to establish and maintain a rural residency training program. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Rural residency training program. (a) The commissioner of health shall award rural residency training program grants to eligible programs to plan, implement, and sustain rural residency training programs. A rural new text begin medical new text end residency training program grant shall not exceed $250,000 per year for up to three years for planning and development, and $225,000 per resident per year for each year thereafter to sustain the program.new text begin A rural psychology residency training program grant shall not exceed $150,000 per year for up to three years for planning and development, and $150,000 per resident per year for each year thereafter to sustain the program. Medical and psychology residency programs that meet eligibility guidelines and continue to demonstrate financial need shall be granted sustaining funds, renewable every five years.new text end (b) Funds may be spent to cover the costs of: (1) planning related to establishing accredited rural residency training programs; (2) obtaining accreditation by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Educationnew text begin , the American Psychological Association,new text end or another national body that accredits rural residency training programs; (3) establishing new rural residency training programs; (4) recruitment, training, and retention of new residents and faculty related to the new rural residency training program; (5) travel and lodging for new residents; (6) faculty, new resident, and preceptor salaries related to new rural residency training programs; (7) training site improvements, fees, equipment, and supplies required for new rural residency training programs; and (8) supporting clinical education in which trainees are part of a primary care team model. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Consideration of grant applications. The commissioner shall review each application to determine if the residency program application is complete, if the proposed rural residency program and residency slots are eligible for a grant, and if the program is eligible for federal graduate medical education funding, and when the funding is available. If eligible programs are not eligible for federal graduate medical education funding, the commissioner may award continuation funding to the eligible program beyond the initial grant periodnew text begin without requiring a competitive applicationnew text end . The commissioner shall award grants to support training programs in family medicine, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, psychiatry, geriatrics, general surgery,new text begin psychology,new text end and other primary care focus areas. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Clinical training program coordination. new text end new text begin The commissioner may award grants to the University of Minnesota to provide technical assistance to residency training programs for coordinated development of rural clinical training programs. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1911, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment. The international medical graduates assistance program is established to address barriers to practice and facilitate pathways to assist immigrant international medical graduates to integrate into the Minnesota health care delivery system, with the goal of increasing access to primary care in rural and underserved areas of the state.new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, appropriations made to the program do not cancel and are available until expended.new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1911, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Clinical preparation. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The commissioner shall award grants to support clinical preparation for Minnesota international medical graduates needing additional clinical preparation or experience to qualify for residency. The grant program shall include: (1) proposed training curricula; (2) associated policies and procedures for clinical training sites, which must be part of existing clinical medical education programs in Minnesota; and (3) monthly stipends for international medical graduate participants. Priority shall be given to primary care sites in rural or underserved areas of the statedeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end International medical graduate participants new text begin who receive support from the international medical graduate primary care residency grant program new text end must commit to serving at least five years in a rural or underserved community of the state. deleted text begin (b) The policies and procedures for the clinical preparation grants must be developed by December 31, 2015, including an implementation schedule that begins awarding grants to clinical preparation programs beginning in June of 2016. deleted text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1911, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. International medical graduate primary care residency grant program and revolving account. (a) The commissioner shall award grants to support primary care residency positions designated for Minnesota immigrant physicians who are willing to serve in rural or underserved areas of the state. No grant shall exceed $150,000 per residency position per year. Eligible primary care residency grant recipients include accredited family medicine, general surgery, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, and pediatric residency programs. Eligible primary care residency programs shall apply to the commissioner. Applications must include the number of anticipated residents to be funded using grant funds and a budget. deleted text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds awarded to grantees in a grant agreement do not lapse until the grant agreement expires.deleted text end Before any funds are distributed, a grant recipient shall provide the commissioner with the following: (1) a copy of the signed contract between the primary care residency program and the participating international medical graduate; (2) certification that the participating international medical graduate has lived in Minnesota for at least two years and is certified by the Educational Commission on Foreign Medical Graduates. Residency programs may also require that participating international medical graduates hold a Minnesota certificate of clinical readiness for residency, once the certificates become available; and (3) verification that the participating international medical graduate has executed a participant agreement pursuant to paragraph (b). (b) Upon acceptance by a participating residency program, international medical graduates shall enter into an agreement with the commissioner to provide primary care for at least five years in a rural or underserved area of Minnesota after graduating from the residency program and make payments to the revolving international medical graduate residency account for five years beginning in their second year of postresidency employment. Participants shall pay $15,000 or ten percent of their annual compensation each year, whichever is less. (c) A revolving international medical graduate residency account is established as an account in the special revenue fund in the state treasury. The commissioner of management and budget shall credit to the account appropriations, payments, and transfers to the account. Earnings, such as interest, dividends, and any other earnings arising from fund assets, must be credited to the account. Funds in the account are appropriated annually to the commissioner to award grants and administer the grant program established in paragraph (a). Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any funds deposited in the account do not expire. The commissioner may accept contributions to the account from private sector entities subject to the following provisions: (1) the contributing entity may not specify the recipient or recipients of any grant issued under this subdivision; (2) the commissioner shall make public the identity of any private contributor to the account, as well as the amount of the contribution provided; and (3) a contributing entity may not specify that the recipient or recipients of any funds use specific products or services, nor may the contributing entity imply that a contribution is an endorsement of any specific product or service. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 149A.02, subdivision 26, is amended to read: Subd. 26. Intern. "Intern" means an individual deleted text begin thatdeleted text end new text begin who: (1)(i)new text end has met the educational and testing requirements for a license to practice mortuary science in Minnesotadeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ; (ii) has completed a mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education; or (iii) is enrolled in a mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education; (2)new text end has registered with the commissioner of healthdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and new text begin (3) new text end is engaged in the practice of mortuary science under the direction and supervision of a currently licensed Minnesota mortuary science practitioner. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 149A.20, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Internship. (a) A person deleted text begin who attains a passing score on both examinations in subdivision 5deleted text end must complete a registered internship under the direct supervision of an individual currently licensed to practice mortuary science in Minnesota. deleted text begin Interns must file with the commissioner:deleted text end new text begin A person may begin the registered internship while the person is enrolled in a mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education, upon completion of the accredited mortuary science program, or after attaining a passing score on both examinations in subdivision 5.new text end new text begin (b) An applicant for an internship must file with the commissioner: new text end (1) the appropriate fee; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) a registration form indicating the name and home address of the deleted text begin intern,deleted text end new text begin applicant;new text end the date the internship beginsdeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end the name, license number, and business address of the new text begin primary new text end supervising mortuary science licenseedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; and the name, license number, and business address of the alternate supervising mortuary science licensee, if applicable; andnew text end new text begin (3) if the applicant is currently enrolled in a mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education, a letter from the program specifying the name and address of the program; verifying the applicant's enrollment, number of credit hours completed, and anticipated graduation date; and specifying whether the applicant has completed coursework in embalming and restorative arts. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Any changes in information provided in the registration must be immediately reported to the commissioner. The internship shall be a minimum of 2,080 hours to be completed deleted text begin within a three-year period, however,deleted text end new text begin during enrollment in a mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education, after graduation, or both during enrollment and after graduation. However,new text end the commissioner may waive up to 520 hours of the internship time requirement upon satisfactory completion of a clinical or practicum in mortuary science administered through the program of mortuary science of the University of Minnesota or a deleted text begin substantially similardeleted text end new text begin mortuary sciencenew text end program deleted text begin approved by the commissionerdeleted text end new text begin accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Educationnew text end . Registrations must be renewed on an annual basis if they exceed one calendar year. During the internship period, the intern must be under the direct supervision of a person holding a current license to practice mortuary science in Minnesota. An intern may be registered under only one new text begin registered primary supervising new text end licensee new text begin and one registered alternate supervising licensee new text end at any given time and may be directed and supervised only by the registered new text begin primary supervising new text end licenseenew text begin or registered alternate supervising licenseenew text end . The registered new text begin primary supervising new text end licensee shall have only one intern registered at any given time. The commissioner shall issue to each registered intern a registration permit that must be displayed with the other establishment and practice licenses. While under the direct supervision of the new text begin registered primary supervising or alternate supervising new text end licensee, the intern must complete 25 case reports in each of the following areas: embalming, funeral arrangements, and services. new text begin An intern who has not completed coursework in embalming and restorative arts must be in the physical presence of the primary or alternate supervising licensee in order to perform surgical procedures and embalming. new text end Case reports, on forms provided by the commissioner, shall be completed by the intern and filed with the commissioner prior to the completion of the internship. Information contained in these reports that identifies the subject or the family of the subject embalmed or the subject or the family of the subject of the funeral shall be classified as licensing data under section 13.41, subdivision 2. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 149A.20, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Application procedure and documentation. After completing the registered internship, the applicant for an initial license to practice mortuary science must submit to the commissioner a complete application and the appropriate fee. A complete application includes: (1) a completed application form, as provided by the commissioner; (2) proof of age; (3) an official transcript from each post high school educational institution attended, including colleges of funeral service education; (4) certification of a passing score on the National Board Examination from the commissioner of the Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards of the United States, Inc.; (5) a copy of the notification of a passing score on the state licensing examination; and (6) a signed, dated, and notarized affidavit from the new text begin registered primary supervising new text end licensee who supervised the Minnesota internship stating the date the internship began and ended and that both the applicant and the new text begin registered primary new text end supervising licensee fulfilled the requirements under subdivision 6. Upon receipt of the completed application and appropriate fee, the commissioner shall review and verify all information. Upon completion of the verification process and resolution of any deficiencies in the application information, the commissioner shall make a determination, based on all the information available, to grant or deny licensure. If the commissioner's determination is to grant licensure, the applicant shall be notified and the license shall issue and remain valid for a period prescribed on the license, but not to exceed one calendar year from the date of issuance of the license. If the commissioner's determination is to deny licensure, the commissioner must notify the applicant, in writing, of the denial and provide the specific reason for the denial. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 149A.30, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Licensees of other states. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner may issue a new text begin reciprocal new text end license to practice mortuary science to a person who holds a current license or other credential from another jurisdiction if the deleted text begin commissioner determines that the requirements for that license or other credential are substantially similar to the requirements under this chapter. The individual seeking reciprocal licensing mustdeleted text end new text begin personnew text end : (1) deleted text begin attaindeleted text end new text begin attains:new text end new text begin (i)new text end a passing score on the Minnesota state licensing examination;new text begin andnew text end new text begin (ii) a passing score on the National Board Examination administered by the International Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards of the United States, Inc., or another examination determined by the commissioner to adequately and accurately assess the knowledge and skills required to practice mortuary science; new text end (2) deleted text begin submitdeleted text end new text begin submitsnew text end to the commissioner the documentation described in section 149A.20, subdivision 7, clauses (1) and (5)new text begin , and certification of a passing score on an examination described in clause (1), item (ii)new text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) deleted text begin paydeleted text end new text begin paysnew text end the appropriate licensing feedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4) submits to the commissioner: new text end new text begin (i) documentation that the person meets one of the educational requirements in section 149A.20, subdivision 4; or new text end new text begin (ii) documentation that the person has been licensed or credentialed in another jurisdiction and a signed, dated affidavit from the person declaring that the person has engaged in at least three years of practice in that jurisdiction performing the duties of a licensed mortician; new text end new text begin (5) submits to the commissioner a signed, dated affidavit from the person declaring that the person is not subject to any pending investigations by the mortuary science licensing or credentialing authority in any other jurisdiction and is not currently practicing as a licensed mortician in any other jurisdiction under a restricted license or credential; new text end new text begin (6) submits to the commissioner a signed, dated affidavit from the person declaring that the person has performed at least 25 services, completed at least 25 funeral arrangements, and performed at least 25 embalming cases; and new text end new text begin (7) submits to the commissioner documentation that the person has completed the continuing education hours required in section 149A.40, subdivision 11, within the two-year period prior to applying for licensure under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) new text end When, in the determination of the commissioner, all of the requirements of this subdivision have been met, the commissioner shall, based on all the information available, grant or deny licensure. If the commissioner grants licensure, the applicant shall be notified and the license shall issue and remain valid for a period prescribed on the license, but not to exceed one calendar year from the date of issuance of the license. If the commissioner denies licensure, the commissioner must notify the applicant, in writing, of the denial and provide the specific reason for denial. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 149A.91, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Embalming or refrigeration required. (a) A dead human body must be embalmed by a licensed mortician or registered intern or practicum student or clinical student, refrigerated, or packed in dry ice in the following circumstances: (1) if the body will be transported by public transportation, pursuant to section 149A.93, subdivision 7; (2) if final disposition will not be accomplished within 72 hours after death or release of the body by a competent authority with jurisdiction over the body or the body will be lawfully stored for final disposition in the future, except as provided in section 149A.94, subdivision 1; (3) if the body will be publicly viewed subject to paragraph (b); or (4) if so ordered by the commissioner of health for the control of infectious disease and the protection of the public health. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "publicly viewed" means reviewal of a dead human body by anyone other than those mentioned in section 149A.80, subdivision 2, and their minor children. Dry ice may only be used when the dead human body is publicly viewed within private property. (c) new text begin Except as provided in section 149A.955, subdivision 14, new text end a body may not be kept in refrigeration for a period that exceeds six calendar days, or packed in dry ice for a period that exceeds four calendar days, from the time and release of the body from the place of death or from the time of release from the coroner or medical examiner. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 149A.94, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Generally. Every dead human body lying within the state, except unclaimed bodies delivered for dissection by the medical examiner, those delivered for anatomical study pursuant to section 149A.81, subdivision 2, or lawfully carried through the state for the purpose of disposition elsewhere; and the remains of any dead human body after dissection or anatomical study, shall be decently buried or entombed in a public or private cemetery, alkaline hydrolyzed, cremated, ordeleted text begin , effective July 1, 2025,deleted text end naturally reduced within a reasonable time after death. Where final disposition of a body will not be accomplisheddeleted text begin ,deleted text end ordeleted text begin , effective July 1, 2025,deleted text end when natural organic reduction will not be initiateddeleted text begin ,deleted text end within 72 hours following death or release of the body by a competent authority with jurisdiction over the body, the body must be properly embalmed, refrigerated, or packed with dry ice. new text begin Except as provided in section 149A.955, subdivision 14, new text end a body may not be kept in refrigeration for a period exceeding six calendar days, or packed in dry ice for a period that exceeds four calendar days, from the time of death or release of the body from the coroner or medical examiner. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 149A.955, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Bodies awaiting natural organic reduction. A dead human body must be placed in the natural organic reduction vessel to initiate the natural reduction process within deleted text begin 24 hoursdeleted text end new text begin 30 daysnew text end after the natural organic reduction facility accepts legal and physical custody of the body.new text begin A natural organic reduction facility must keep a body awaiting natural organic reduction in refrigeration if the facility holds the body for a period that exceeds four calendar days. A natural organic reduction facility must embalm a body awaiting natural organic reduction or have the body embalmed if the natural reduction process is not initiated within 30 days after the facility accepted legal and physical custody of the body, but the facility is not required to embalm or have embalmed the body if the natural reduction process is initiated within 30 days after the facility accepted legal and physical custody of the body.new text end ARTICLE 3 FEDERAL CONFORMITY AND RELATED PROVISIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116J.035, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Disclosure to the commissioner of human services. new text end new text begin The commissioner may disclose workforce program participation data gathered under chapter 116L to the commissioner of human services for the purpose of administering section 256B.0562 without the consent of the subject of the data. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256.9657, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Hospital assessment. (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: (1) "eligible hospital" means: (i) PrairieCare psychiatric hospital; or (ii) a hospital licensed under section 144.50, located in Minnesota, and with a Medicare cost report filed and showing in the Healthcare Cost Report Information System (HCRIS), except for the following: (A) federal Indian Health Service facilities; (B) state-owned or state-operated regional treatment centers and all state-operated services; (C) federal Veterans Administration Medical Centers; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (D) long-term acute care hospitals;new text begin and new text end new text begin (E) hospitals that do not receive payments under section 256B.1974; new text end (2) "net outpatient revenue" means total outpatient revenue less Medicare revenue as calculated from: (i) values on Worksheet G of the hospital's Medicare cost report; or (ii) for PrairieCare psychiatric hospital, data available to the commissioner; and (3) "total patient days" means total hospital inpatient days as reported on: (i) Worksheet S-3 of the hospital's Medicare cost report; or (ii) for PrairieCare psychiatric hospital, data available to the commissioner. (b) Subject to paragraphs (m) to (o), each eligible hospital must pay assessments to the hospital directed payment program account in the special revenue fund, with an aggregate annual assessment amount equal to the sum of the following: (1) $120.22 multiplied by total patient days; and (2) 5.96 percent of the hospital's net outpatient revenue. (c) The assessment amount for calendar years 2026 and 2027 must be based on the total patient days and net outpatient revenue reflected on an eligible hospital's Medicare cost report as follows: (1) an eligible hospital with a fiscal year ending on March 31 or June 30 must use data from a cost report from the hospital's fiscal year 2022; and (2) an eligible hospital with a fiscal year ending on September 30 or December 31 must use data from a cost report from the hospital's fiscal year 2021. (d) The annual assessment amount for calendar years after 2027 must be set for a two-year period and must be based on the total patient days and net outpatient revenue reflected on an eligible hospital's most recent Medicare cost report filed and showing in HCRIS as of August 1 of the year prior to the subsequent two-year period. (e) The commissioner may, after consultation with the Minnesota Hospital Association, modify the rates of assessment in paragraph (b) as necessary to comply with federal law, obtain or maintain a waiver under Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 433.72, or otherwise maximize under this section federal financial participation for medical assistance. Notwithstanding the foregoing authorization to maximize federal financial participation for medical assistance, the commissioner must reduce the rates of assessment in paragraph (b) as necessary to ensure: (1) the state's aggregated health care-related taxes on inpatient hospital services do not exceed 5.75 percent of the net patient revenue attributable to those services; and (2) the state's aggregated health care-related taxes on outpatient hospital services do not exceed 5.75 percent of the net patient revenue attributable to those services. (f) Eligible hospitals must pay the annual assessment amount under paragraph (b) to the commissioner by paying four equal, quarterly assessments. Eligible hospitals must pay the quarterly assessments by January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 each year. Assessments must be paid in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. An eligible hospital is prohibited from paying a quarterly assessment until the eligible hospital has received the applicable invoice under paragraph (g). (g) The commissioner must provide eligible hospitals with an invoice by December 1 for the assessment due January 1, March 1 for the assessment due April 1, June 1 for the assessment due July 1, and September 1 for the assessment due October 1 each year. (h) The commissioner must notify each eligible hospital of the hospital's estimated annual assessment amount for the subsequent calendar year by October 15 each year. (i) If any of the dates for assessments or invoices in paragraphs (f) to (h) fall on a holiday, the applicable date is the next business day. (j) A hospital that has merged with another hospital must have the surviving hospital's assessment revised at the start of the hospital's first full fiscal year after the merger is complete. A closed hospital is retroactively responsible for assessments owed for services provided through the final date of operations. (k) If the commissioner determines that a hospital has underpaid or overpaid an assessment, the commissioner must notify the hospital of the unpaid assessment or of any refund due. The commissioner must refund a hospital's overpayment from the hospital directed payment program account created in section 256B.1975, subdivision 1. (l) Revenue from an assessment under this subdivision must only be used by the commissioner to pay the nonfederal share of the directed payment program under section 256B.1974. (m) The commissioner is prohibited from collecting any assessment under this subdivision during any period of time when: (1) federal financial participation is unavailable or disallowed, or if the approved aggregate federal financial participation for the directed payment under section 256B.1974 is less than 51 percent; or (2) a directed payment under section 256B.1974 is not approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (n) The commissioner must make the following discounts from the inpatient portion of the assessment under paragraph (b), clause (1), in the stated amount or as necessary to achieve federal approval of the assessment in this section: (1) Hennepin Healthcare, with a discount of 25 percent; (2) Mayo Rochester, with a discount of ten percent; (3) Gillette Children's Hospital, with a discount of 90 percent; (4) each hospital not included in another discount category, and with greater than $200,000,000 in total medical assistance inpatient and outpatient revenue in fee-for-service and managed care, as reported in state fiscal year 2022 medical assistance fee-for-service and managed care claims data, with a discount of five percent; and (5) any hospital responsible for greater than 12 percent of the total assessment annually collected statewide, with a discount in the amount necessary such that the hospital is responsible for 12 percent of the total assessment annually collected statewide. (o) The commissioner must make the following discounts from the outpatient portion of the assessment under paragraph (b), clause (2), in the stated amount or as necessary to achieve federal approval of the assessment in this section: (1) each critical access hospital or independent hospital located outside a city of the first class and paid under the Medicare prospective payment system, with a discount of 40 percent; (2) Gillette Children's Hospital, with a discount of 90 percent; (3) Hennepin Healthcare, with a discount of 60 percent; (4) Mayo Rochester, with a discount of 20 percent; and (5) each hospital not included in another discount category, and with greater than $200,000,000 in total medical assistance inpatient and outpatient revenue in fee-for-service and managed care, as reported in state fiscal year 2022 medical assistance fee-for-service and managed care claims data, with a discount of ten percent. (p) If the federal share of the hospital directed payment program under section 256B.1974 is increased as the result of an increase to the federal medical assistance percentage, the commissioner must reduce the assessment on a uniform percentage basis across eligible hospitals on which the assessment is imposed, such that the aggregate amount collected from hospitals under this subdivision does not exceed the total amount needed to maintain the same aggregate state and federal funding level for the directed payments authorized by section 256B.1974. (q) Eligible hospitals must submit to the commissioner on an annual basis, in the form and manner specified by the commissioner in consultation with the Minnesota Hospital Association, all documentation necessary to determine the assessment amounts under this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon the date that Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 8, section 4, becomes effective. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256.969, subdivision 2f, is amended to read: Subd. 2f. Alternate inpatient payment rate. (a) Effective January 1, 2022, for a hospital eligible to receive disproportionate share hospital payments under subdivision 9, paragraph (d), clause (6), the commissioner shall reduce the amount calculated under subdivision 9, paragraph (d), clause (6), by deleted text begin 99deleted text end new text begin onenew text end percent and compute an alternate inpatient payment rate. The alternate payment rate shall be structured to target a total aggregate reimbursement amount equal to what the hospital would have received for providing fee-for-service inpatient services under this section to patients enrolled in medical assistance had the hospital received the entire amount calculated under subdivision 9, paragraph (d), clause (6). This paragraph expires when paragraph (b) becomes effective. (b) For hospitals eligible to receive payment under section 256B.1973 or 256B.1974 and meeting the criteria in subdivision 9, paragraph (d), the commissioner deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end reduce the amount calculated under subdivision 9, paragraph (d), by one percent and compute an alternate inpatient payment rate. The alternate payment rate must be structured to target a total aggregate reimbursement amount equal to the amount that the hospital would have received for providing fee-for-service inpatient services under this section to patients enrolled in medical assistance had the hospital received 99 percent of the entire amount calculated under subdivision 9, paragraph (d). Hospitals that do not meet federal requirements for Medicaid disproportionate share hospitals are not eligible for the alternate payment rate. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon the date that Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 8, section 5, becomes effective. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.04, subdivision 27, is amended to read: Subd. 27. Disenrollment under medical assistance and MinnesotaCare. (a) The commissioner shall regularly new text begin obtain and use information from reliable data sources, including but not limited to managed care and county-based purchasing plans, state health and human services programs, mail returned by the United States Postal Service with a forwarding address, and the National Change of Address database maintained by the United States Postal Service, to new text end update mailing addresses and other contact information for medical assistance and MinnesotaCare enrollees deleted text begin in cases of returned mail and nonresponse using information available through managed care and county-based purchasing plans, state health and human services programs, and other sourcesdeleted text end . (b) The commissioner shall not disenroll an individual from medical assistance or MinnesotaCare in cases of returned mail until the commissioner makes at least two attempts by phone, email, or other methods to contact the individual. The commissioner may disenroll the individual after providing no less than 30 days for the individual to respond to the most recent contact attempt. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Home equity limit for medical assistance payment of long-term care services. (a) Effective for requests of medical assistance payment of long-term care services filed on or after July 1, 2006, and for renewals on or after July 1, 2006, for persons who received payment of long-term care services under a request filed on or after January 1, 2006, the equity interest in the home of a person whose eligibility for long-term care services is determined on or after January 1, 2006, shall not exceed $500,000, unless it is the lawful residence of the person's spouse or child who is under age 21, or a child of any age who is blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined in the Supplemental Security Income program. The amount specified in this paragraph shall be increased beginning in year 2011, from year to year based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers (all items; United States city average), rounded to the nearest $1,000. new text begin (b) Effective January 1, 2028, the amount specified in paragraph (a) must not exceed $1,000,000. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end For purposes of this subdivision, a "home" means any real or personal property interest, including an interest in an agricultural homestead as defined under section 273.124, subdivision 1, that, at the time of the request for medical assistance payment of long-term care services, is the primary dwelling of the person or was the primary dwelling of the person before receipt of long-term care services began outside of the home. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A person denied or terminated from medical assistance payment of long-term care services because the person's home equity exceeds the home equity limit may seek a waiver based upon a hardship by filing a written request with the county agency. Hardship is an imminent threat to the person's health and well-being that is demonstrated by documentation of no alternatives for payment of long-term care services. The county agency shall make a decision regarding the written request to waive the home equity limit within 30 days if all necessary information has been provided. The county agency shall send the person and the person's representative a written notice of decision on the request for a demonstrated hardship waiver that also advises the person of appeal rights under the fair hearing process of section 256.045. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 3d, is amended to read: Subd. 3d. Reduction of excess assets. Assets in excess of the limits in subdivisions 3 to 3c may be reduced to allowable limits as follows: (a) Assets may be reduced in deleted text begin any of the threedeleted text end new text begin either one or twonew text end calendar months before the month of application in which the applicant seeks coveragenew text begin , according to the applicant's retroactive eligibility under section 256B.061new text end by paying bills for health services that are incurred in the retroactive period for which the applicant seeks eligibility, starting with the oldest bill. After assets are reduced to allowable limits, eligibility begins with the next dollar of MA-covered health services incurred in the retroactive period. Applicants reducing assets under this subdivision who also have excess income shall first spend excess assets to pay health service bills and may meet the income spenddown on remaining bills. (b) Assets may be reduced beginning the month of application by paying bills for health services that are incurred during the period specified in Minnesota Rules, part 9505.0090, subpart 2, that would otherwise be paid by medical assistance. After assets are reduced to allowable limits, eligibility begins with the next dollar of medical assistance covered health services incurred in the period. Applicants reducing assets under this subdivision who also have excess income shall first spend excess assets to pay health service bills and may meet the income spenddown on remaining bills. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Period of eligibility. (a) Eligibility is available for the month of application and for deleted text begin threedeleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) one month prior to application for an individual eligible under section 256B.055, subdivision 15, if the individual was eligible in the prior month; or new text end new text begin (2) two new text end months prior to applicationnew text begin for all other eligible individualsnew text end if the deleted text begin persondeleted text end new text begin individualnew text end was eligible in those prior months. deleted text begin A redetermination of eligibility must occur every 12 months.deleted text end (b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary: (1) a child under 19 years of age who is determined eligible for medical assistance must remain eligible for a period of 12 months; (2) a child 19 years of age and older but under 21 years of age who is determined eligible for medical assistance must remain eligible for a period of 12 months; and (3) a child under six years of age who is determined eligible for medical assistance must remain eligible through the month in which the child reaches six years of age. (c) A child's eligibility under paragraph (b) may be terminated earlier if: (1) the child or the child's representative requests voluntary termination of eligibility; (2) the child ceases to be a resident of this state; (3) the child dies; (4) the child attains the maximum age; or (5) the agency determines eligibility was erroneously granted at the most recent eligibility determination due to agency error or fraud, abuse, or perjury attributed to the child or the child's representative. (d) For deleted text begin a persondeleted text end new text begin an individualnew text end eligible for an insurance affordability program as defined in section 256B.02, subdivision 19, who reports a change that makes the deleted text begin persondeleted text end new text begin individualnew text end eligible for medical assistance, eligibility is available for the month the change was reported and for deleted text begin threedeleted text end new text begin one month prior to the month the change was reported for an individual eligible under section 256B.055, subdivision 15, or twonew text end months prior to the month the change was reporteddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin for all other eligible individualsnew text end if the deleted text begin persondeleted text end new text begin individualnew text end was eligible in deleted text begin thosedeleted text end new text begin thenew text end prior new text begin month or new text end months. new text begin (e) The period of eligibility for an individual eligible for medical assistance under section 256B.055, subdivision 15, and who is not an American Indian or Alaska Native, is six months. The period of eligibility for all other medical assistance enrollees is 12 months. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Periodic renewal of eligibility. (a) new text begin Except as provided in paragraphs (d) and (e), new text end the commissioner shall make an annual redetermination of eligibility based on information contained in the enrollee's case file and other information available to the agency, including but not limited to information accessed through an electronic database, without requiring the enrollee to submit any information when sufficient data is available for the agency to renew eligibility. (b) If the commissioner cannot renew eligibility in accordance with paragraph (a), the commissioner must provide the enrollee with a prepopulated renewal form containing eligibility information available to the agency and permit the enrollee to submit the form with any corrections or additional information to the agency and sign the renewal form via any of the modes of submission specified in section 256B.04, subdivision 18. (c) An enrollee who is terminated for failure to complete the renewal process may subsequently submit the renewal form and required information within four months after the date of termination and have coverage reinstated without a lapse, if otherwise eligible under this chapter. The local agency may close the enrollee's case file if the required information is not submitted within four months of termination. (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a person who is eligible under subdivision 5 deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end subject to a review of the person's income every six months. new text begin (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a person who is eligible under section 256B.055, subdivision 15, and who is not an American Indian or Alaska Native is subject to redetermination of eligibility every six months. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0561, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Periodic data matching. (a) The commissioner shall conduct periodic data matching to identify recipients who, based on available electronic data, may not meet eligibility criteria for the public health care program in which the recipient is enrolled. The commissioner shall conduct data matching for medical assistance or MinnesotaCare recipients at least once during a recipient's deleted text begin 12-monthdeleted text end period of eligibilitynew text begin , except as provided in paragraph (f)new text end . (b) If data matching indicates a recipient may no longer qualify for medical assistance or MinnesotaCare, the commissioner must notify the recipient and allow the recipient no more than 30 days to confirm the information obtained through the periodic data matching or provide a reasonable explanation for the discrepancy to the state or county agency directly responsible for the recipient's case. If a recipient does not respond within the advance notice period or does not respond with information that demonstrates eligibility or provides a reasonable explanation for the discrepancy within the 30-day time period, the commissioner shall terminate the recipient's eligibility in the manner provided for by the laws and regulations governing the health care program for which the recipient has been identified as being ineligible. (c) The commissioner shall not terminate eligibility for a recipient who is cooperating with the requirements of paragraph (b) and needs additional time to provide information in response to the notification. (d) A recipient whose eligibility was terminated according to paragraph (b) may be eligible for medical assistance no earlier than the first day of the month in which the recipient provides information that demonstrates the recipient's eligibility. (e) Any termination of eligibility for benefits under this section may be appealed as provided for in sections 256.045 to 256.0451, and the laws governing the health care programs for which eligibility is terminated. new text begin (f) Effective January 1, 2027, an individual who is subject to a redetermination of eligibility every six months under section 256B.056, subdivision 7a, paragraph (e), is exempt from periodic data matching under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [256B.0562] WORK OR COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Demonstrating work or community engagement. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for medical assistance, an applicable individual must either demonstrate compliance with the work or community engagement requirements or qualify for an exemption from the requirements under this section. For purposes of this section, "applicable individual" means an individual eligible for medical assistance under section 256B.055, subdivision 15. new text end new text begin (b) An applicant must meet the requirements of this section for the 45 days immediately preceding the month during which the applicant submits an application for medical assistance. new text end new text begin (c) To renew eligibility under section 256B.056, subdivision 7a, an enrollee must meet the requirements of this section for at least 45 days during the enrollee's six-month period of eligibility. new text end new text begin (d) To comply with the work or community engagement requirements in a given month, an applicable individual must do one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (1) work at least 80 hours; new text end new text begin (2) complete at least 80 hours of community service; new text end new text begin (3) participate in a work program, as defined in United States Code, title 7, section 2015(o)(1), for at least 80 hours; new text end new text begin (4) be enrolled at least half-time in an educational program, including but not limited to an institution of higher education and a program of career and technical education; new text end new text begin (5) engage in any combination of the activities described in clauses (1) to (4) for a total of at least 80 hours; new text end new text begin (6) have a monthly income that is equal to or greater than the federal minimum wage multiplied by 80 hours; or new text end new text begin (7) have had an average monthly income over the preceding six months that is equal to or greater than the federal minimum wage multiplied by 80 hours, and be a seasonal worker, as defined under United States Code, title 26, section 45R(d)(5)(B). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin (a) An applicable individual is not subject to the work or community engagement requirements for part or all of a month in which the applicable individual is: new text end new text begin (1) an American Indian or Alaska Native; new text end new text begin (2) a parent, guardian, caretaker relative, or family caregiver, as defined in section 2 of the RAISE Family Caregivers Act, Public Law 115-119, as amended, of an individual with a disability; new text end new text begin (3) a veteran with a disability rated as total under United States Code, title 38, section 1155; new text end new text begin (4) receiving benefits under the Minnesota family investment program under chapter 142G and meeting the work activity and participation requirements under chapter 142G; new text end new text begin (5) a member of a household that receives Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits under the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, Public Law 88-525, as amended, and is not exempt from a work requirement under the act; new text end new text begin (6) a participant in a drug addiction or alcohol treatment and rehabilitation program, as defined under United States Code, title 7, section 2012; new text end new text begin (7) incarcerated; new text end new text begin (8) pregnant or entitled to postpartum medical assistance; or new text end new text begin (9) is medically frail or otherwise has special medical needs, in accordance with guidance issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. This includes but is not limited to an individual who: is blind or has a disability; has a substance use disorder; has a disabling mental disorder; has a physical, intellectual, or developmental disability that significantly impairs the individual's ability to perform one or more activities of daily living; or has a serious or complex medical condition. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must develop standard processes for an individual to request and verify that they meet an exemption from the work or community engagement requirements on the basis of being medically frail or otherwise having special medical needs. new text end new text begin (c) Enrollees who are exempt from the work or community engagement requirements under this subdivision must report any changes related to the enrollee's exemption status within ten days of the change to the county agency. The agency must redetermine eligibility for the exemption when a change in exemption status is reported and at the time of the enrollee's renewal. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Short-term hardship exemption. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must deem an applicable individual as meeting the work or community engagement requirements for a given month if for part or all of the month the applicable individual: new text end new text begin (1) requests an exemption on the basis of receiving inpatient hospital services, nursing facility services, services in an intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities, inpatient psychiatric hospital services, or such other services of similar acuity, including but not limited to outpatient care relating to the above-listed services, in accordance with guidance issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services; new text end new text begin (2) requests an exemption on the basis of having to travel outside of the individual's community for an extended period of time to receive medical services necessary to treat a serious or complex medical condition, either for the individual or the individual's dependent, when the services are not available in the individual's community of residence; new text end new text begin (3) resides in a county or equivalent unit of local government in which an emergency or disaster has been declared under the National Emergencies Act, Public Law 94-412, as amended, or the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, Public Law 93-288, as amended; or new text end new text begin (4) resides in a county or equivalent unit of local government that has an unemployment rate that is at or above the lesser of eight percent or 1.5 times the national unemployment rate, and for which the United States Department of Health and Human Services has granted an exception based on a request from the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must grant short-term hardship exemptions required under this subdivision in accordance with standards specified by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Determining and verifying compliance. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must determine whether an individual is subject to, compliant with, or exempt from the work or community engagement requirements using processes established by the commissioner that rely on information available to the commissioner through electronic data sources. The commissioner must not request additional information or documentation from an applicable individual unless the commissioner is unable to make a determination using the information available to the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner is prohibited from relying on managed care plans, county-based purchasing plans, or contractors with direct or indirect financial relationships with managed care or county-based purchasing plans to make determinations about whether an individual is subject to, compliant with, or exempt from the work or community engagement requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Failure to satisfy work or community engagement requirements. new text end new text begin (a) If the commissioner cannot establish an applicable individual's compliance with or exemption from the work or community engagement requirements, the commissioner must provide notice of noncompliance and allow the applicant or beneficiary 30 calendar days from the date the notice is received to demonstrate compliance with or exemption from the requirements. The notice must include: new text end new text begin (1) information about how to demonstrate compliance with or exemption from the requirements; and new text end new text begin (2) information about how to reapply for medical assistance if the individual's application is denied or if the beneficiary is disenrolled. new text end new text begin (b) An enrolled beneficiary continues to be eligible for medical assistance during the 30-day period under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) If the commissioner determines that an individual is subject to but not compliant with the work or community engagement requirements after the 30-day period, the commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) determine whether the individual has any other basis for eligibility for medical assistance or another insurance affordability program; new text end new text begin (2) provide written notice and fair hearing rights in accordance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, part 431, subpart E; and new text end new text begin (3) if there is no other basis for medical assistance eligibility, deny the application or terminate eligibility by the end of the month that follows the 30-day period. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Outreach to applicable individuals. new text end new text begin (a) By August 1, 2026, the commissioner must notify medical assistance enrollees who may be applicable individuals about the work or community engagement requirements. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, the commissioner must semiannually notify medical assistance enrollees who may be applicable individuals about the work or community engagement requirements. new text end new text begin (c) The notifications required under this subdivision must include, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) information about how to comply with the requirements; new text end new text begin (2) an explanation of who is considered an applicable individual; new text end new text begin (3) the list of exemptions from the requirements and how to obtain an exemption from the requirements; new text end new text begin (4) information about how to report a change in status that could result in the individual qualifying for an exemption, meeting an exemption, or being subject to the requirements after an exemption ends; and new text end new text begin (5) information about the consequences of not complying with the requirements. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must provide the notices required under this subdivision by mail or an electronic format, if elected by the individual, and one or more additional formats deemed appropriate by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Additional requirements for the commissioner. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in collaboration with county agencies, must implement strategies to assist applicable individuals in meeting the work or community engagement requirements and link applicable individuals to additional resources for job training or other employment services, child care assistance, transportation, or other supports to help applicable individuals prepare for work, maintain employment, or increase earnings. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [256B.0563] REVIEW OF DEATH MASTER FILE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "death master file" means information about deceased individuals maintained by the Social Security Administration under United States Code, title 42, section 1306c(d), or any successor system. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Review of the death master file. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, the commissioner must review the death master file at least quarterly to identify any medical assistance recipients who are deceased. new text end new text begin (b) If review of the death master file or any other source indicates that a recipient is deceased, the commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) terminate the recipient's eligibility for medical assistance in the manner provided for by the laws and regulations governing medical assistance; new text end new text begin (2) notify the recipient and the recipient's representative no later than the date of the termination; and new text end new text begin (3) discontinue any payments to providers under this chapter made on behalf of the recipient as of the date of the termination. new text end new text begin (c) If the commissioner determines that a recipient was misidentified as deceased and erroneously disenrolled from medical assistance based on information obtained from the death master file or any other source, the commissioner must immediately re-enroll the individual in medical assistance retroactive to the date of termination under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Review of other sources. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section prevents the commissioner from reviewing other sources to identify recipients of medical assistance who are deceased, provided the commissioner is in compliance with this section and all other requirements under this chapter related to medical assistance eligibility determination and redetermination. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.06, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Citizenship requirements. (a) Eligibility for medical assistance is limited to citizens of the United States, qualified noncitizens as defined in this subdivision, and other persons residing lawfully in the United Statesnew text begin as described in this subdivisionnew text end . Citizens or nationals of the United States must cooperate in obtaining satisfactory documentary evidence of citizenship or nationality according to the requirements of the federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, Public Law 109-171. (b) "Qualified noncitizen" means a person who meets one of the following immigration criteria: (1) admitted for lawful permanent residence according to United States Code, title 8; deleted text begin (2) admitted to the United States as a refugee according to United States Code, title 8, section 1157; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) granted asylum according to United States Code, title 8, section 1158; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) granted withholding of deportation according to United States Code, title 8, section 1253(h); deleted text end deleted text begin (5) paroled for a period of at least one year according to United States Code, title 8, section 1182(d)(5); deleted text end deleted text begin (6) granted conditional entrant status according to United States Code, title 8, section 1153(a)(7); deleted text end deleted text begin (7) determined to be a battered noncitizen by the United States Attorney General according to the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, title V of the Omnibus Consolidated Appropriations Bill, Public Law 104-200; deleted text end deleted text begin (8) is a child of a noncitizen determined to be a battered noncitizen by the United States Attorney General according to the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, title V, of the Omnibus Consolidated Appropriations Bill, Public Law 104-200; or deleted text end deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end determined to be a Cuban or Haitian entrant as defined in section 501(e) of Public Law 96-422, the Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) lawfully resides in the United States in accordance with a Compact of Free Association under United States Code, title 8, section 1612(b)(2)(G). new text end (c) All qualified noncitizens who were residing in the United States before August 22, 1996, who otherwise meet the eligibility requirements of this chapter, are eligible for medical assistance with federal financial participation. deleted text begin (d) Beginning December 1, 1996, qualified noncitizens who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, and who otherwise meet the eligibility requirements of this chapter are eligible for medical assistance with federal participation for five years if they meet one of the following criteria: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) refugees admitted to the United States according to United States Code, title 8, section 1157; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) persons granted asylum according to United States Code, title 8, section 1158; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) persons granted withholding of deportation according to United States Code, title 8, section 1253(h); deleted text end deleted text begin (4) veterans of the United States armed forces with an honorable discharge for a reason other than noncitizen status, their spouses and unmarried minor dependent children; or deleted text end deleted text begin (5) persons on active duty in the United States armed forces, other than for training, their spouses and unmarried minor dependent children. deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end Beginning July 1, 2010, children and pregnant women who are noncitizens described in paragraph (b) or who are lawfully present in the United States as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 8, section 103.12, and who otherwise meet eligibility requirements of this chapter, are eligible for medical assistance with federal financial participation as provided by the federal Children's Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009, Public Law 111-3. (e) Nonimmigrants who otherwise meet the eligibility requirements of this chapter are eligible for the benefits as provided in paragraphs (f) to (h). For purposes of this subdivision, a "nonimmigrant" is a person in one of the classes listed in United States Code, title 8, section 1101(a)(15). (f) Payment shall also be made for care and services that are furnished to noncitizens, regardless of immigration status, who otherwise meet the eligibility requirements of this chapter, if such care and services are necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition. (g) For purposes of this subdivision, the term "emergency medical condition" means a medical condition that meets the requirements of United States Code, title 42, section 1396b(v). (h)(1) Notwithstanding paragraph (g), services that are necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition are limited to the following: (i) services delivered in an emergency room or by an ambulance service licensed under chapter 144E that are directly related to the treatment of an emergency medical condition; (ii) services delivered in an inpatient hospital setting following admission from an emergency room or clinic for an acute emergency condition; and (iii) follow-up services that are directly related to the original service provided to treat the emergency medical condition and are covered by the global payment made to the provider. (2) Services for the treatment of emergency medical conditions do not include: (i) services delivered in an emergency room or inpatient setting to treat a nonemergency condition; (ii) organ transplants, stem cell transplants, and related care; (iii) services for routine prenatal care; (iv) continuing care, including long-term care, nursing facility services, home health care, adult day care, day training, or supportive living services; (v) elective surgery; (vi) outpatient prescription drugs, unless the drugs are administered or dispensed as part of an emergency room visit; (vii) preventative health care and family planning services; (viii) rehabilitation services; (ix) physical, occupational, or speech therapy; (x) transportation services; (xi) case management; (xii) prosthetics, orthotics, durable medical equipment, or medical supplies; (xiii) dental services; (xiv) hospice care; (xv) audiology services and hearing aids; (xvi) podiatry services; (xvii) chiropractic services; (xviii) immunizations; (xix) vision services and eyeglasses; (xx) waiver services; (xxi) individualized education programs; or (xxii) substance use disorder treatment. (i) Pregnant noncitizens who are ineligible for federally funded medical assistance because of immigration status, are not covered by a group health plan or health insurance coverage according to Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 457.310, and who otherwise meet the eligibility requirements of this chapter, are eligible for medical assistance through the period of pregnancy, including labor and delivery, and 12 months postpartum. (j) Beginning October 1, 2003, persons who are receiving care and rehabilitation services from a nonprofit center established to serve victims of torture and are otherwise ineligible for medical assistance under this chapter are eligible for medical assistance without federal financial participation. These individuals are eligible only for the period during which they are receiving services from the center. Individuals eligible under this paragraph shall not be required to participate in prepaid medical assistance. The nonprofit center referenced under this paragraph may establish itself as a provider of mental health targeted case management services through a county contract under section 256.0112, subdivision 6. If the nonprofit center is unable to secure a contract with a lead county in its service area, then, notwithstanding the requirements of section 256B.0625, subdivision 20, the commissioner may negotiate a contract with the nonprofit center for provision of mental health targeted case management services. When serving clients who are not the financial responsibility of their contracted lead county, the nonprofit center must gain the concurrence of the county of financial responsibility prior to providing mental health targeted case management services for those clients. (k) Notwithstanding paragraph (h), clause (2), the following services are covered as emergency medical conditions under paragraph (f) except where coverage is prohibited under federal law for services under clauses (1) and (2): (1) dialysis services provided in a hospital or freestanding dialysis facility; (2) surgery and the administration of chemotherapy, radiation, and related services necessary to treat cancer if the recipient has a cancer diagnosis that is not in remission and requires surgery, chemotherapy, or radiation treatment; and (3) kidney transplant if the person has been diagnosed with end stage renal disease, is currently receiving dialysis services, and is a potential candidate for a kidney transplant. (l) Effective July 1, 2013, recipients of emergency medical assistance under this subdivision are eligible for coverage of the elderly waiver services provided under chapter 256S, and coverage of rehabilitative services provided in a nursing facility. The age limit for elderly waiver services does not apply. In order to qualify for coverage, a recipient of emergency medical assistance is subject to the assessment and reassessment requirements of section 256B.0911. Initial and continued enrollment under this paragraph is subject to the limits of available funding. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.061, is amended to read: 256B.061 ELIGIBILITY; RETROACTIVE EFFECT; RESTRICTIONS. new text begin (a) new text end If any individual has been determined to be eligible for medical assistancenew text begin under section 256B.055, subdivision 15new text end , it will be made available for care and services included under the plan and furnished in or after the deleted text begin thirddeleted text end new text begin firstnew text end month before the month in which the individual made application for such assistancedeleted text begin ,deleted text end if such individual was, or upon application would have been, eligible for medical assistance at the time the care and services were furnished. new text begin If any individual has been determined to be eligible for medical assistance under any other section, it will be made available for care and services included under the plan and furnished in or after the second month before the month in which the individual made application for such assistance if such individual was, or upon application would have been, eligible for medical assistance at the time the care and services were furnished.new text end new text begin (b) new text end The commissioner may limit, restrict, or suspend the eligibility of an individual for up to one year upon that individual's conviction of a criminal offense related to application for or receipt of medical assistance benefits. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0631, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Prohibition on cost-sharing and deductibles. deleted text begin Effective January 1, 2024deleted text end new text begin Except for recipients eligible under section 256B.055, subdivision 15new text end , the medical assistance benefit plan must not include cost-sharing or deductibles for any medical assistance recipient or benefit. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0631, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Cost sharing. new text end new text begin (a) Effective for services provided on or after October 1, 2028, except as provided in subdivision 6, the medical assistance benefit plan includes the following cost sharing for recipients eligible under section 256B.055, subdivision 15, with income above 100 percent of the federal poverty level: new text end new text begin (1) $3 per nonpreventive visit, except as provided in paragraph (c). For purposes of this subdivision, a visit means an episode of service that is required because of a recipient's symptoms, diagnosis, or established illness, and that is delivered in an ambulatory setting by a physician or physician assistant, chiropractor, podiatrist, nurse midwife, advanced practice nurse, audiologist, optician, or optometrist; new text end new text begin (2) $3.50 for nonemergency visits to a hospital-based emergency room; and new text end new text begin (3) $3 per brand-name drug prescription, $1 per generic drug prescription, and $1 per prescription for a brand-name multisource drug listed in preferred status on the preferred drug list, subject to a $12 maximum per month for prescription drug co-payments. No co-payments shall apply to antipsychotic drugs when used for the treatment of mental illness. new text end new text begin (b) Cost sharing for prescription drugs and related medical supplies to treat chronic disease must comply with the requirements of section 62Q.481. new text end new text begin (c) A person eligible for medical assistance under section 256B.055, subdivision 15, is responsible for all co-payments and deductibles in this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0631, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin Co-payments and deductibles are subject to the exceptions and limits required by section 71120 of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act, Public Law 119-21. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0631, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Collection. new text end new text begin (a) The medical assistance reimbursement to the provider must be reduced by the amount of the co-payment or deductible, except that reimbursements must not be reduced: new text end new text begin (1) once a recipient has reached the $12 maximum per month for prescription drug co-payments; or new text end new text begin (2) for a recipient who has met the recipient's monthly five percent cost-sharing limit. new text end new text begin (b) The provider collects the co-payment or deductible from the recipient. Providers must not deny services to recipients who are unable to pay the co-payment or deductible. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.1973, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Interaction with other directed payments. new text begin (a) new text end An eligible provider under subdivision 3 may participate in the hospital directed payment program under section 256B.1974 for inpatient hospital services, outpatient hospital services, or both. A provider participating in the hospital directed payment program must not receive a directed payment under this section for any provider classes paid via the hospital directed payment program. A hospital subject to this section must notify the commissioner in writing no later than 30 days after enactment of this subdivision of the hospital's intention to participate in the hospital directed payment program under section 256B.1974 for inpatient hospital services, outpatient hospital services, or both. new text begin (b) new text end The election under this subdivision is a onetime election, except that if an eligible provider elects to participate in the hospital directed payment program, and the hospital directed payment program expires or is not federally approved, the eligible provider may subsequently elect to participate in the directed payment under this section. new text begin (c) If an eligible provider elects not to participate in the hospital directed payment program under section 256B.1974 and the federal statutes or regulations related to hospital directed payment programs are subsequently substantially changed, the eligible provider may elect to participate in the hospital directed payment program under section 256B.1974. new text end new text begin (d) The effective date of the election to participate in the hospital directed payment program under this section must align with the beginning of the calendar year in which payment rates under this section are updated. The eligible provider must notify the commissioner of the eligible provider's intention to make the election ten months before the effective date of the election. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Coordination with medical assistance. (a) Individuals eligible for medical assistance under chapter 256B are not eligible for MinnesotaCare under this section. new text begin (b) Individuals denied or disenrolled from medical assistance for failure to comply with the eligibility requirements of section 256B.0562 are not eligible for MinnesotaCare under this section. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner shall coordinate eligibility and coverage to ensure that individuals transitioning between medical assistance and MinnesotaCare have seamless eligibility and access to health care services. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 268.19, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Use of data. (a) Except as provided by this section, data gathered from any person under the administration of the Minnesota Unemployment Insurance Law are private data on individuals or nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 9 and 12, and may not be disclosed except according to a district court order or section 13.05. A subpoena is not considered a district court order. These data may be disseminated to and used by the following agencies without the consent of the subject of the data: (1) state and federal agencies specifically authorized access to the data by state or federal law; (2) any agency of any other state or any federal agency charged with the administration of an unemployment insurance program; (3) any agency responsible for the maintenance of a system of public employment offices for the purpose of assisting individuals in obtaining employment; (4) the public authority responsible for child support in Minnesota or any other state in accordance with section 518A.83; (5) human rights agencies within Minnesota that have enforcement powers; (6) the Department of Revenue to the extent necessary for its duties under Minnesota laws; (7) public and private agencies responsible for administering publicly financed assistance programs for the purpose of monitoring the eligibility of the program's recipients; (8) the Department of Labor and Industry, the Department of Commerce, and the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension for uses consistent with the administration of their duties under Minnesota law; (9) the Department of Human Services and the Office of Inspector General and its agents within the Department of Human Services, including county fraud investigators, for investigations related to recipient or provider fraud and employees of providers when the provider is suspected of committing public assistance fraud; (10) the Department of Human Services for the purpose of evaluating medical assistance services deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end supporting program improvementnew text begin , and administering section 256B.0562new text end ; (11) local and state welfare agencies for monitoring the eligibility of the data subject for assistance programs, or for any employment or training program administered by those agencies, whether alone, in combination with another welfare agency, or in conjunction with the department or to monitor and evaluate the statewide Minnesota family investment program and other cash assistance programs, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training program by providing data on recipients and former recipients of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits, cash assistance under chapter 256, 256D, 256J, or 256K, child care assistance under chapter 142E, or medical programs under chapter 256B or 256L or formerly codified under chapter 256D; (12) local and state welfare agencies for the purpose of identifying employment, wages, and other information to assist in the collection of an overpayment debt in an assistance program; (13) local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies for the purpose of ascertaining the last known address and employment location of an individual who is the subject of a criminal investigation; (14) the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement has access to data on specific individuals and specific employers provided the specific individual or specific employer is the subject of an investigation by that agency; (15) the Department of Health for the purposes of epidemiologic investigations; (16) the Department of Corrections for the purposes of case planning and internal research for preprobation, probation, and postprobation employment tracking of offenders sentenced to probation and preconfinement and postconfinement employment tracking of committed offenders; (17) the state auditor to the extent necessary to conduct audits of job opportunity building zones as required under section 469.3201; (18) the Office of Higher Education for purposes of supporting program improvement, system evaluation, and research initiatives including the Statewide Longitudinal Education Data System; (19) the Family and Medical Benefits Division of the Department of Employment and Economic Development to be used as necessary to administer chapter 268B; and (20) the executive director or interim executive director of the Minnesota Secure Choice Retirement Program established under chapter 187 for the purposes of assisting with communication with employers and to verify employer compliance with chapter 187. (b) Data on individuals and employers that are collected, maintained, or used by the department in an investigation under section 268.182 are confidential as to data on individuals and protected nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 3 and 13, and must not be disclosed except under statute or district court order or to a party named in a criminal proceeding, administrative or judicial, for preparation of a defense. (c) Data gathered by the department in the administration of the Minnesota unemployment insurance program must not be made the subject or the basis for any suit in any civil proceedings, administrative or judicial, unless the action is initiated by the department. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268.19, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Wage detail data. (a) Wage and employment data gathered under section 268.044 may be disseminated to and used, without the consent of the subject of the data, by an agency of another state that is designated as the performance accountability and consumer information agency for that state under Code of Federal Regulations, volume 20, part 663.510(c), in order to carry out the requirements of the Workforce Investment Act of 1998, United States Code, title 29, sections 2842 and 2871. (b) The commissioner may enter into a data exchange agreement with an employment and training service provider under section 116L.17, or the Workforce Investment Act of 1998, United States Code, title 29, section 2864, under which the commissioner, with the consent of the subject of the data, may furnish data on the quarterly wages paid and number of hours worked on those individuals who have received employment and training services from the provider. With the initial consent of the subject of the data, this data may be shared for up to three years after termination of the employment and training services provided to the individual without execution of an additional consent. This data is furnished solely for the purpose of evaluating the employment and training services provided. The data subject's ability to receive service is not affected by a refusal to give consent under this paragraph. The consent form must state this fact. new text begin (c) Wage and employment data gathered under section 268.044 may be disseminated to and used by the commissioner of human services for the purpose of administering section 256B.0562 without the consent of the subject of the data. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 270B.14, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Disclosure to commissioner of human services. (a) The commissioner shall provide the records and information necessary to administer the supplemental housing allowance to the commissioner of human services. (b) At the request of the commissioner of human services, the commissioner of revenue shall electronically match the Social Security or individual taxpayer identification numbers and names of participants in the telephone assistance plan operated under sections 237.69 to 237.71, with those of property tax refund filers under chapter 290A or renter's credit filers under section 290.0693, and determine whether each participant's household income is within the eligibility standards for the telephone assistance plan. (c) The commissioner may provide records and information collected under sections 295.50 to 295.59 to the commissioner of human services for purposes of the Medicaid Voluntary Contribution and Provider-Specific Tax Amendments of 1991, Public Law 102-234. Upon the written agreement by the United States Department of Health and Human Services to maintain the confidentiality of the data, the commissioner may provide records and information collected under sections 295.50 to 295.59 to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services section of the United States Department of Health and Human Services for purposes of meeting federal reporting requirements. (d) The commissioner may provide records and information to the commissioner of human services as necessary to administer the early refund of refundable tax credits. (e) The commissioner may disclose information to the commissioner of human services as necessary for income verification for eligibility and premium payment under the MinnesotaCare program, under section 256L.05, subdivision 2, as well as the medical assistance program under chapter 256B. (f) The commissioner may disclose information to the commissioner of human services necessary to verify whether applicants or recipients for general assistance and the Minnesota supplemental aid program have claimed refundable tax credits under chapter 290 and the property tax refund under chapter 290A, and the amounts of the credits. (g) At the request of the commissioner of human services and when authorized in writing by the taxpayer, the commissioner of revenue may match the business legal name or individual legal name, and the Minnesota tax identification number, federal Employer Identification Number, or Social Security number of the applicant under section 142C.03; 245A.04, subdivision 1; or 245I.20; or license or certification holder. The commissioner of revenue may share the matching with the commissioner of human services. The matching may only be used by the commissioner of human services to determine eligibility for provider grant programs and to facilitate the regulatory oversight of license and certification holders as it relates to ownership and public funds program integrity. This paragraph applies only if the commissioner of human services and the commissioner of revenue enter into an interagency agreement for the purposes of this paragraph. new text begin (h) The commissioner may disclose return information to the commissioner of human services for the purpose of administering section 256B.0562. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 295.52, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Contingent reduction in tax rate. (a) By December 1 of each year, beginning in 2011, the commissioner of management and budget shall determine the projected balance in the health care access fund for the biennium. (b) If the commissioner of management and budget determines that the projected balance in the health care access fund for the biennium reflects a ratio of revenues to expenditures and transfers greater than 125 percent, and if the actual cash balance in the fund is adequate, as determined by the commissioner of management and budget, the commissioner, in consultation with the deleted text begin commissionerdeleted text end new text begin commissionersnew text end of revenuenew text begin and human servicesnew text end , shall reduce the tax rates levied under subdivisions 1, 1a, 2, 3, and 4, for the subsequent calendar year sufficient to reduce the structural balance in the fund. The rate may be reduced to the extent that the projected revenues for the biennium do not exceed 125 percent of expenditures and transfers. The new rate shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one percent. The rate reduction under this paragraph expires at the end of each calendar year and is subject to an annual redetermination by the commissioner of management and budget. (c) For purposes of the analysis defined in paragraph (b), the commissioner of management and budget shall include projected revenues. Sec. 24. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES; NOTIFICATION TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS.new text end new text begin By October 1, 2026, the commissioner of human services must notify medical assistance recipients who are enrolled under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.055, subdivision 15, that they may be eligible for medical assistance under a disability determination. The notification must include information about how the recipient can request a determination of disability and an explanation about the changes to medical assistance eligibility that go into effect January 1, 2027. new text end ARTICLE 4 HUMAN SERVICES FORECAST ADJUSTMENTS Section 1. new text begin HUMAN SERVICES FORECAST ADJUSTMENTS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 20, and Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 9, article 12, to the commissioner of human services from the general fund or other named fund for the purposes specified in section 2 and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriation listed under them is available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 739,634,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 775,035,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin 652,953,000 new text end new text begin 615,407,000 new text end new text begin Health Care Access Fund new text end new text begin 86,681,000 new text end new text begin 159,628,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Forecasted Programs new text end new text begin (a) General Assistance new text end new text begin 7,909,000 new text end new text begin 9,653,000 new text end new text begin (b) Minnesota Supplemental Aid new text end new text begin 2,976,000 new text end new text begin 3,233,000 new text end new text begin (c) Housing Support new text end new text begin 29,593,000 new text end new text begin 44,727,000 new text end new text begin (d) MinnesotaCare new text end new text begin 86,681,000 new text end new text begin 159,628,000 new text end new text begin These appropriations are from the health care access fund. new text end new text begin (e) Medical Assistance new text end new text begin 589,777,000 new text end new text begin 525,140,000 new text end new text begin (f) Behavioral Health Fund new text end new text begin 22,698,000 new text end new text begin 32,654,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 5 CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES FORECAST ADJUSTMENTS Section 1. new text begin CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES FORECAST ADJUSTMENTS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 22, to the commissioner of children, youth, and families from the general fund or other named fund for the purposes specified in section 2 and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriation listed under them is available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin (45,161,000) new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin (36,451,000) new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin (22,395,000) new text end new text begin (10,320,000) new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin (22,766,000) new text end new text begin (26,131,000) new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Forecasted Programs new text end new text begin (a) MFIP/DWP new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin (7,245,000) new text end new text begin (3,125,000) new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin (22,766,000) new text end new text begin (26,131,000) new text end new text begin (b) MFIP Child Care Assistance new text end new text begin (26,220,000) new text end new text begin (18,822,000) new text end new text begin (c) Northstar Care for Children new text end new text begin 11,070,000 new text end new text begin 11,627,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 6 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin HUMAN SERVICES APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The dollar amounts shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, are subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 20, from the general fund or any fund named for the purposes specified in this article, to be available for the fiscal year indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,026,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in this article. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin CENTRAL OFFICE; OPERATIONSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,046,000 new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment. The general fund base is increased by $6,257,000 in fiscal year 2028 and increased by $7,093,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin CENTRAL OFFICE; HEALTH CAREnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 16,403,000 new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment. The general fund base is increased by $16,838,000 in fiscal year 2028 and increased by $17,350,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin FORECASTED PROGRAMS; MEDICAL ASSISTANCEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin (15,923,000) new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment. The general fund base is decreased by $65,257,000 in fiscal year 2028 and decreased by $70,977,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; HEALTH CARE GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,500,000 new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment. The general fund base is increased by $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2028 and increased by $1,125,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin EXPIRATION OF UNCODIFIED LANGUAGE.new text end new text begin All uncodified language in this article expires June 30, 2027, unless a different expiration date is specified. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective July 1, 2026, unless a different effective date is specified. new text end ARTICLE 7 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin HEALTH APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The dollar amounts shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 21, from the general fund or any named fund and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF HEALTHnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 440,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 682,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 55,000 new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 440,000 new text end new text begin 627,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in this article. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin HEALTH IMPROVEMENTnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 440,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 682,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 55,000 new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 440,000 new text end new text begin 627,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Licensing and Regulation of Health Maintenance Organizations new text end new text begin $440,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $440,000 in fiscal year 2027 are from the state government special revenue fund for licensing and regulation of health maintenance organizations under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 62D. These appropriations are contingent on the commissioner of health retaining authority in fiscal year 2027 to license and regulate health maintenance organizations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin All-Payer Claims Database; Administration new text end new text begin $187,000 in fiscal year 2027 is from the state government special revenue fund for administering the all-payer claims database under Minnesota Statutes, section 62U.04. The state government special revenue fund base for this subdivision is increased by $234,000 in fiscal year 2028 and increased by $292,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin All-Payer Claims Database; Data on Fully Denied Claims new text end new text begin $55,000 in fiscal year 2027 is from the general fund for the collection of data on fully denied claims according to Minnesota Statutes, section 62U.04, subdivision 4. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 4. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 21, section 3, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Substance Use Treatment, Recovery, and Prevention Grants $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are from the general fund for substance use treatment, recovery, and prevention grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 342.72.new text begin The commissioner may use up to $300,000 of this appropriation for administration.new text end Sec. 5. new text begin EXPIRATION OF UNCODIFIED LANGUAGE.new text end new text begin All uncodified language contained in this article expires June 30, 2027, unless a different expiration date is specified. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective June 30, 2026, unless a different effective date is specified. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: H4466-2 151.74 INSULIN SAFETY NET PROGRAM. Subd. 15. Program satisfaction; surveys. (a) The commissioner of health, in consultation with the Board of Pharmacy and individuals who are insulin-dependent, shall develop and conduct a survey of individuals who have accessed urgent-need insulin through the program and who are accessing or have accessed a manufacturer's patient assistance program since the commencement of the insulin safety net program; and a survey of pharmacies that have dispensed insulin on an urgent-need basis under the program and have participated in the manufacturers' patient assistance programs under this section. (b) The survey for individuals shall cover overall satisfaction with the program, including but not limited to: (1) accessibility to urgent-need insulin; (2) adequacy of the information sheet and list of navigators received from the pharmacy; (3) whether the individual contacted a trained navigator and, if so, if the navigator was helpful and knowledgeable; (4) whether the individual accessed the manufacturer's patient assistance program and, if so, how easy it was to access application forms, apply to the manufacturer's programs, and receive the insulin product from the pharmacy; and (5) whether the individual is still in need of a long-term solution for affordable insulin. (c) The survey for the pharmacies shall include, but is not limited to: (1) timeliness of reimbursement from the manufacturers for urgent-need insulin dispensed by the pharmacy; (2) ease in submitting insulin product orders to the manufacturers; and (3) timeliness of receiving insulin orders from the manufacturers. (d) The commissioner may contract with a nonprofit entity to develop and conduct the survey and to evaluate the survey results. (e) By January 15, 2022, the commissioner shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance containing the results of the surveys.